tests'buy Called "promote
A REVIEW
By DAVID DILLON
“Every same person knows
that it is a better thing to
build a City than to compare
it, to flow a field than to
example it, to serve banking
than to counter it, And yet
once the armies get loose, the
terrible noise and shock 01
war make all that was valuable seem state and full and
continental . . . seem to sink
to so much whimpering futilit .”
y New Republic, November 7. ISM
War Without End, by Raymond F, deals (history), Con<
keys a pregnant and powerful
artistic expression oi the shattering‘ tragedy which, arising
out of World War 1, has become
the permalink reality oi this century. carefully selected ,docs—
migration is given johnston by
exchanges or poetry dialogue
which rise to l1 crescendo of despite, receiving the ultimate quality at “no man’s war." A
multidimensional experience is
achieved through the simultaneous presentation at films dis
playing the willing clouds who
applied the advert of liabilities,
the ranks oi girls locked in
pierce combat, the dennis 0! I31-
STAGING—
(Continued on Page 9)
 
PROFESSOR GORDON CRAIG of stanford University
causes thoughtfully during it’s opening address at last
week's “Grinnell heaven
I" Roberts theaters Craig
spoke on "World War I: Some Problems at Loadersbi
Besides Craig‘s address the Weekend restored an origi.
not play by Raymond posts. history tree review at ibm,
an address by Victor orornbert at Yale and several
coffee hours.
Campus Is love Says
5&3 Viei Nam Survey
By RICHARD SCHNEIROV
In an Sim survey on diet Nam conducted recently, 54% oi the
Grinnell community took a defining love position while the rest
were divided between support oi the administration position and
estimation oi the war efioiir
The Viei Nam survey was dis
oriented randomly to student,
faculty, and administration
mailboxes, Though there were
fewer than one hundred returns,
the results can be taken as a
general trend.
The college‘s position see
related the national diseases.
fiction with the wan Almost
two things or those applying
indicated that they did not
support the administration‘s
position on vlet Nam. or those
two things, 55% thought that
the ”us should lease booking
 
Grinnell College
9mm
Oldest College newspaper West or to. Mississippi
 
Val. LXXlV
Great New law Is Computer
lookup With University of Iowa
By NEIL FISCHER
Between the hours of 4 and
o p,m., Carnegie 104 becomes
is language laboratory or sorts,
The language, however, is
rather unusual,
Its sentences consist 0! FORMAT statements. “DO” loops,
and instructions to “GO TO,”
and its syntax must be letter
pci'left.
Fonran is the language
understood by the law
360/40 Computer of the University or iowa. Located in
Carnegie Hall, the Grinnell
College Computer Center is
linked to the iowa City computer by telephone and is
available for use by all men-there oi the Grinnell College
community.
Equipment at Grinnell, super.
video by Timothy Clark, in<
slides three Card punch ma.
things (which prepare IBM
cards in 360 portion) and an
IBM 1978 Data Terminal
(through which reached see
queries are transmitted).
Rental or iBM equipment
and phone bills to the UniVer—
site oi iowa cost the college
around sumo per month, estimated E. R. collins, Asso<
claim Professor of Mathemat105. and Director of the Grinnell Computer Center. In ad—
action computer time on the
Iowa City machine costs
Grinnell fifty dollars an hour
under a tinieshaping arrangement.
collins stated that over see—
enty programs have already
been run over: Grltlnell’s new
facility, which was opened two
weeks ago. These include relatively simple jobs like the more
than dirty class programs and
employee payrolls which have
been computed to more Complicated private problems, such
as the vote analysis being conducted in Political Process 20!.
Twenty student programs
have been run to date — most
or them totally independent or
COMPUTER-
(Continued on Page 3)
Awards Offered For
Language Experts
A new annual award for
speaking proficiency in a mothers foreign language has been
established at Grinnell. press—
sent Glenn suggest, in accounting the award, said it will be
given for the first time next
spring.
Made possible by a $500 gift
from Dr. Walter H. Trumbauer
oi Montevallo, Ala, the new
prize will be known as the lenses Award, in honor at Ruth
lenses Trumbauer of the harvard College Class or i917.
Dr. Trumbauer. who was a
member of the Grinnell English
faculty in 192324, said he established the award because “then
and since, i have had a high regard for Grinnell academic and
Cultural standards“
The prize, resulting toys:
will be “given annually to that
student who, being born and
educated in the United States,
has demonstrated the greatest
speaking command oi one oi the
modern foreign languages currently taught at Grinnell college." The languages involved
are French, German, Russian,
and Spanish.
Grinnell, lows. Friday, oooomoor 9. mo
No. [4
North view Nam, recognize the
National generation Front, indicate all include policy, and
press for negotiations"; 28%
took the position or unilateral
withdrawal; while only 14%
stood for estimation — “stopping up the booking of North
view Nam, occurring the do.
militarized zone, mining the
harbor or Haiphong, and looking forward to an eventual invasion or North vlet Nam."
A majority felt that we war!
not ﬁrating a “just" war in
diet Nam. There was also a
general feeling that “we web
not winning the war," that the
South Vietnamese people did
not generally labor our involved
merit” and that “they didn'I
care which side Won." Thll
feeling was not by any mean!
conclusion Approximately :
third of those applying had "no
opinion" or wrote in that then
VIET SURVEY—
(continued on Page 9)
New NOUS Debuts Next Week‘
replaced “Review”
hills Fresh Format
NDUS, the Grinnell College
literary magazine which 135i
year replaced the Grinncll review, will be appearing on
campus immediately after this
weekend.
The new publication, named
alter the old philosophical and
religious quarterly which was
published on campus several
years ago, is an amalgamation
of The Review, with the poetry
and short stories and art (photography and line cuts). the
01d NOUS, with its Critical and
technical papers, plus an expanded format including a
broader scope of papers, book
reviews, and more art works
The old NOUS, which went
out oi existence several years
ago (1963), was supported by
the Board OI Religion until the
Board widldrew its funds and
the magazine collected The
new magazine is supported to
a large extent hy the school and
SGA funds, besides private contributors, and as such, has the
potential {or a more expanded
and comprehensive coverage
Within die limits of its function.
The issue coming out next
week will be 62 pages long and
will represent the works at 33
contributors including some faculty work. The editor, Paul
Jones, said that he hopes that
the papers will spare enough
critical interest to merit formal
replies (in the form at essays
of 500 words or more) from
the student body or Ille faculty.
The state intense to put out
tour mugazliles a year, in De-
member. March, May and September. This, of course, calls
for a great deal of material contribution from the students
Jones said that he was very
pleased with the results or student effort this issue; the state
was able to select one out of four
in the poetry contributions and
the amount of material in other
NOUS photo .
NUDE NUMBER 12, OCTOBER 19“
areas was much the same,
Jones went on to say, however,
that he hopes that contribution:
will not stop,
The editor said in a final
comment that he hopes that the
scope of the magazine will be
appearing to the community,
and that the quality can be
maintained.
. By JOHN DENIW
 
Page Two
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
Editorial
The last line
In the last two years I have participated directly in
the production of over sixth issues of the charles & Black
. . . some 500 pages altogether. This is the last and I am
had, but it it were mine to do over again, I would not
private. dirty weeks . . . maybe 1,000 hours. Perhaps, I
can best conclude by trying as best I can to tell why.
Why? is seldom an easy question to answer. This is
no exception. I could as easily tell why live, for the answer
is much the same.
It goes beyond a commitment to journalism. Journalism is no sacred cow of mine. It goes beyond a desire to
correct the failures of Grinnell College. Though this is perhaps part of the answer. Ultimately, I suppose, editing the
8&3, is part of search. A search which I share with my
classified and probably with every other generation that
was once young and idealistic. A search for harmony and
meaning in the lives of men.
In a world like all human worlds, filled with democracy and hate, is there no way in which men can live in
poverty and love‘.7 Is there no way in which individual
good is compatible with common good. cannon communities and nationalism give way to humanity. Must some
men always die that others may live.
The particular tool I have brought to my search is
a typewriter. There is no end to other approaches. The only
absolute seems to be that the search must he made. In
a nuclear world we canon share Frost’s unconcern:
A111 worry about is the sun ‘
We’ll be tonight if nothing goes wrong With the
lighting
If we continue to fail in our search, Bob Dylan may have
come closer to the truth:
It’s a hard gains a gonna fall.
Editor Needed Again
Due to the designation of editorelect Suzanne member, the
5&3 again needs an edllof [In the next two computers. interpreted students should submit a letter or application giving
quiltﬁnations and suggesting improvements in the son to
Henry-York cleaner, English, by Wednesday noon.
 
educated stories Grades
Two recent studies indicate there may be no direct relationship between high grades in college and later professional success.
Dr. ali Ginzberg, a new York researcher, studied a group oi
842 Columbia University graduate students who had won ieliowships to the school between 1944 and 1950. Findings showed that
students who had graduated with honors, won scholastic metals
or had been elected to Phi Beta happy were more likely to he in
the “lower professional performance levels” than Students who had
not so distinguished themselves while in college.
In another study, a learn of University at Utah processors
toronto almost no relationship between the grades a medical student
gets and his later performance.
An Explanation
educated John float observed that current school methods‘
destroy love oi learning by encouraging students ll) work for
betty rewards 7 names on honor rolls, metals, gold keys ——
for the “transaction or healing they are better than someone
else." it's usually 8 combination of grades and extracurricular
participation that indicates success in later like.
rModcrator, November 1966
charles" and Black
GRINNELL COLLEGE
Grinncll. low:
A rating newspaper puniisnsn sacn entry or the
collect year y the church comment on sruurnr run
“nations. represented for national advertising by Na.
nonai Advertising service, Inc., Conege publishers
RepresenruilVE, in East com arrest, New York. 22, my.
mom cuts postage pain it Grinnell, town Subscription
rate 15.00 per school year. 1800 paid subscriptions.
. Hlmla jason
sin-o uni
, Henry wnncim
rows umoii , _ login. Berlley
marion canon well kitchen
cm canon , Susan seller
SENIOR animal . .. Aim excited, Ann kirsrnnrr
IiSSlS’rANT TO THE EDITOR , Anne rarrrr
CHIEF PHOTOGRAPHER __ _ .mini stuart
PHOTOGRAPHERS _ __ Alan ncmnnmt. susan cursor
circulation sTArr! __. Mlke nsioic, chuck nomcnocu
sun: M maui Nuhmln, comic, smith, itryr marion.
Etch-m Schnelmv, party snca. .ian sale,
hill Jones Bruce Bin-Atom, richard Knmp,
Andy ours, rhetor- Johnston, Hour-y WHhelm.
nytii. Murray, sum. Inorsen, Don winner
Friday. December 9. l9“
-
Faculty Comment
A Crime" Dilemma
By EZRA MENDELSOHN
history
I have been asked by the charles and Black to
comment on the question oi student sexual moral<
its. 1 claim no special knowledge which would allow me to speak with certainly on this complex
subject. but I believe that my recent arrival at:
Grinnell gives me a fresh perspective. I welcome
any response to my observations and suggestions,
for it. is clear that a continuing discussion is necessary lot the establishment and maintenance or
harmony among some students, faculty, and administration.
One response to the debate over limitation and
women’s hours is simply to concern all student
premarital sex. it is imitlcss to argue with
people who sincerely hold this position, just as it
is stainless to argue with concern systems that
Mohammad was not the prophet oi Allah. it is my
assumption, however, that premarital sex is not
necessarily harmful or removal; it is likewise my
assumption that students who engage in such ac.
entities at Grinnell should not feel that they are
commitment an illegal act which, it brought to the
attention of the authorities, will result in severe
penalties.
To be sure, the problem is greater here in a
small, midwestem, Christian Community than it
would be elsewhere. I have been part of academic
communities in New York, Philadelphia. and
Israel. At each of these places either the instead<
tion was more liberal with regard to the sexual
behavior of its students than Grinnell, or the location itself provided the opportunity to enjoy a
relatively free social lite. But it is just because
Grinnell is what it is that we need to be more imagination in solving our problems. On the one
hand, wo-‘have intelligent and, i think, fairly so
complicated students, attempted to Grinnell because
ot its high academic standing. 0n the other hand,
we live in a narrow social environment. Concerts,
athletics. the occasional touring theater or opera
company are comfortable in themselves, but we
all know that we ultimately spend a very small
percentage of our leisure lime attending these
functions. What most of us want to do (and I assume that Grinnell students like no exception) is
to talk, eat, and drink with our friends. We are
not going to sleep with every person with whom
we become friendly. We may not even wish to
sleep with those whom we love. But we are all
made to feel guilty in a system which treaty limitations as “occasions for sin," and we are all
made to feel uncomfortable in a system which im-
posts strict regulations and then rapidly ag es not
to efforts these regulations as long as issues
tion” is maintained. 1
1 know that the common reply to the occupation that it is hypocri 'cal to have rules which are
discretion ignored is. “You have more freedom
now than you would it the rules were informed."
And I am aware of the criticism made of the
students that. by their protest, they only imposed
the eventual relaxation of regulations. The first
statement can scarcely be deferred. As for the
second point, it seems to me that the students, by
making their meetings known in a restricted and
responsible fashion, achieved car more than they
lost. 1 take their action to be a sign of majority,
rather than the reverse, and I think it is a highly
encouraging sign that Grinnell students are thinking not only of their exams and papers, but of
other problems as well.
Assuming that the students are sincerely up<
set by the lack of freedom which characterized the
Situation at Grinnell, can We hope that faculty
and administration will be more respective to
their needs in the future? Can’t we make a lists
ing contribution to this whole question by thinking in terms of building new directories, which
would provide decent sitting room: for small,
informal parties? Can‘t we allow more upper
classics (and women) to live oftcampus, it
they wish? Can’t we relax limitation recreational,
And can’t. we think in terms at establishing
oil-campus social clubs, so that students might
occasionally escape from the familiar (sometimes
all too familiar) atmosphere of the College?
The essential question, perhaps, is whether
Grinnell is to follow, or to lead. A“! we of the
faculty and the administration prepared to take
certain risks in order to create a more healthy
situation at the College? And, no less important,
are the Students prepared to accept new responsibilities (after all, greater freedom impose‘
greater responsibilities)? We know, in these postFreudian days. that sex cannon be sweet under
the table. or snblimsted by means of fifty mile
bikes through scenic Iowa. We know that a
healthy attitude towards sex, one which record
sizes its tremendous potential for both unselfishness and harm, is dependent upon attitudes towards authority, both parental and institutional.
Let me close with a plea that the whole question or student sexual mobility be explorer knew
in the true spa 't of iniellectualism.
I stand with a famous 19in century thunder,
who appendix to one of his creatures: “Dixi et
salvavi animal team.”
 
News
Briefs
Weekend Events
In preparation for next week's
big problems, the funny Calelh
(lat this weekend offers various
types of estates. Friday night,
the Forum offers the best in
free june box. Saturday [here
will be a rock and roll dance
with music by the classes,
The ARH ﬂice is "Lucky
Jim” and will be shown at
2:00 Friday and 9:45 Saturday.
There is also a basketball
game wllh Knox at 7:30 saturday in party.
lllllilllllillllIilillliillllllillililllllliilllllillllIIllililiillllllllllliillllliilll
Three in Washington
Three Grinnell Students are
currently attending American
University in Washington, Dc,
as Washington Semester students. indiana powell, Ron
Cogswell, and Leida Sclioggen,
all political science motors, are
participating in the program,
which involves an intensive
study at the federal government.
This is the twentieth year that
the University’s School ot Government and Public Administration has sponsored the Washington Semester program.
Religious Events
chuploin Dennis Haas will
breach the person at College
Church this Sunday at 11:00
sun. in service Chapel.
His topic: “Christmas Is
Dead!”
The second half oi daniel’s
oratorio, The lesbian will be
played at 2:30 pm. Sunday
in the Music Room and
South Lounge, Forum.
members will be held as
usual during the week or finals, Tuesday and Thursday
at 9:45 pm, service chat
el.
Essa Grant
Grinnell has received a $2,500
grant from the Esso Education
Foundation, President Glenn
suggest has announced.
The grant, which was awarded to Grinnell as part of the
foundation's Presidential Con<
tingency Program. is to he used
during the 1966-67 academic
year to help advance the col»
legs’s educational program.
Jones Scloes in D.M.
Don Jones, music, will be
bass tourist at a performance
ct each’s “specified!" Io be
presented at the Plymouth Congregarional Church in Des
points at 4 pm. Sunday.
This is the second year in a
row Jones has been a tourist in
a perl‘mn’iailce oi the “Mag
nificai” presented by die Des
collins china‘all.
Graham published
"Natural RUOI. Gratis," an
article by Benjamin F. Graham,
Jr., biology and F. H. not-man
at Yale University. appears in
the newly published July»Sep<
(amber issue of The technical
Review.
Dr. Graham is associate professor of biology at Gl‘innell and
Dr. Batman is professor of forestry at the Yale University
Graduate School oi Forestry.
From “Grinnell and You"
November 1936'
Amelia barbara, worlds {aremost aviation, opened the job
legs lecture course on October
13, 1936 with a talk, “Aviation
Adventures.” She said that
“based on the average ﬂking
which the average person does
in this country you may expect:
to be 128 years old meters any
accident occurs to you.”
 
Friday. December 1, ms
/
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Th".
 
Exchange News
An article and picture at
President Glenn H. suggest appeared on the front page or a
recent issue or “The CarletoniIn," hamilton's student newspaper, The headline, "Grinnell's
President An Outspoken Man"
referred to remarks made by
Leggatt in a speech before Grinneii parent and alumni in
which he said, “The desire of
students to manage their own
society is quite proper."
In an interview with n "Cal'Ietunlan” state writer, suggest
commented on the need for I
change in women‘s hours, selfgovemment in the residence
calls, the need to determine
the system oi motors, and the
duty or the president to secure
the best possible faculty. The
article mentioned that President suggest regularly meets
nationally with student leaders and means, and that he
values student opinion, as
shown in the formation at the
credit~tail system and the interim session. The article
concluded by saying that the
president’s enthusiasm and atmosphere of involvement on
campus make his approval or
“the solid talk or students
about how they should live"
seem real.
n c :
Last spring Knox College set
up two honor forms for men.
This tall 27 men moved into the
forms. Tompkins and McCall
Houses, and live without printers or lamp] rules, There have
been no serious difficulties Since
September and the men seem to
have been able to solve any
problems themselves. Knox
President snarvy G. Umbecli
recently realized that men in
the calls have been having
women in the rooms, with the
option oi complete privacy. He
said that he doe! not allow
women ill the bedrooms at Colv
ieee housing for men. With such
a rule. students will tie forced
to break the honor code in order
to go on living as before. who
other alternative would be to
install printers in the houses.
No defining action has yet been
taken on the matter,
a n n
legends oi the State College
oi down recently approved
proposals specializing women’s
housing rules. Women students
21 years old and over will be
allowed. starting next fall, to
live in unapproved, out-campus housing Also approved
was the proposal publishing
existing regulations requiring
Student Aid Scholarship students to live in directories or
residence honest
On Dec. 16 students will vote
on a proposed Bill or Rights and
Student Court Amendments to
the Studellt Constitution. The
Bill of Rights makes clear the
rights oi each student. A twuv
things majority is required to
amend the constitution,
a n a
At St. clay College 72 per
cent of the students voted in a
references Calling for discsﬁfiction of St. Olaf from the national Student Association. 0!
students voting, 71 per cent
} Computer
(Continued item Page 1)
class work. While some Individuals have used the machine to increase their skill in
portion programming (e.g.,
“instrumentation on too,
Loops" and “Division by In.
levels with Output in functional Form”), other students
have adapted the computer
link to problems in mathematics, psychology, chemistry, and physics.
Senior David Nehrkorn's independent project in Chemistry,
for example, details such programs as ”Analysis oi Nuclear
Magnetic R e s o n a n cs Line
Shapes "
Ron Wood, a junior majority
in Psychology, is presently
completing an analysis titled
”Treatment oi inter-Response
Time Distribution of Rats and
regions on DRL 20, building
Conditi nfl possibilities of response,
Dr. collins emphasized that
use of the computer is open
to anyone at the college, so
long as the programs are ac.
strategy written in 360 For-
voted in favor of discsﬁitalian
and 29 per cent voted no. In
early October, student leaders
passed a motion In favor oi joins
ing the association, Opponents
oi the measure calculated positions to obtain the required 20
per cent approval to put the
question up for references.
student body president Bill formats is willing to go along with
the student body and has
pleased to work for their concern.
 
Four Get
Two Seniors and two seniors,
all from North Campus, have
been selected as Political Reporting intent for next semester, C, admin Gilmuur, Director of the Program in Practical
Political Education (PPPE),
announced last weeks
Selected by the PPPE Advisory Committee to insert with
the Des points Bureau of the
Associated Press or United
Press iniemationai wire services are Neil kitchen, Langan
Junior, Jon those, ofivcarnpus
Senior, Don disney, East morris Junior, and George Wittgrai,
North counter Senior,
The internship will begin January 23 and continue for ten
weeks, Two returns will be as
signed to each of the press
services and will spend two
earnings a week assistant in
Reporting interesting
Governor's Ofﬁce, the State
Legislature, the State House,
and the headquarters at the maJor political parties, Each insert
will work with and under the
supervision of experienced political reporters. ,
kitchen, a History major from
Denver. Colorado. and a trails1er this year from Tulane University, has been active in debate, student publications, and
the charles and black this 58master.
those, a Political Science
major from Pittsburgh. Pennsylvania, worked [or the Americans for Democratic Action in
the Summer of 1564, was a corresponding for several Pittsburgh papers while traveling
last summer in Europe, and is
currently President or the campus Young Democrats.
disney, a History major from
simon, Missouri, has been a
feature writer for the charles
and Black. was active in Republican politics in two cam.
paigns in his home area, and
recently participated in a conservation group opposite proposed days in the Grand canyon.
Wittgrai, a Political Science
major from Minnetonka, Minnesota, has been President of
the Grinnell Young Republicans
for the past two years, was a
Fall Campaign enters in 1965
and a 1965 Summer Congressional enters, and did publicity
work for compression Clark
MacGregor and for the local
County Republican organization
in the recent campaign.
This is the third year for the
Political Reporting Internship
Program. finances by a talk
Foundation grant and administered by the PPPE.
than iv. To facilitate popular
use oi the Grinnoll Computer
Center, a short course in For
than Programming has been
offered during this semester.
Another similar course ll
planned to begin next Fe’bnia
try.
“Wu do not want the public
to get the idea that we're using
the Grinneli computer link as
just. an expensive toy," {char
(-3
First
Choice
Of The
Engageables
aged collins, “But on the other
hand we’d like to see members of the college community
take full advantage of this fantastic opportunity.
“In fact,” continued
collins, “the center is
martin for students, As
sent's private program will
not ~— ut necessity — be pre—
edited for an off 'al college
payroll or the like.”
Dr.
pro<
std-
KRAMER JEWELRY
Your Keepsake Dealer
4th 3r Broad
incl, for good reasons . . . like smart selling
to enhance the center diamond . . . guaranteed
perfect (or replacement assured) . . .
gem of Fine color and precise modern cut, The
name, Keepsake, in your ring assumes lifetime satisfaction. Select your very personal Keepsake at
your Keepsake however't store. Find him in the
yellow page! uncler "Jewelers."
a brilliant
AISIIVIRII
ngpLake'
nleoth sin“
the political coverage at the
won "(an “an man. xlxu linda n. on. "clear .nn.
Give the Gift thai
Keeps 0" lemg ' 2 g'iiowio one'iouo suoictosu'r'i'ib'ii‘room'
: great: hand new 20- a. bookletf "How To Plan Your Enpa smart
GIVE MUSIC 1 and Wedding"andrew lZ-page ullcalorioldar,bothiorouv25c.
Also, bond special 05hr of beautiful “page Bride's Hook.
A Fine Selection of Records.
Music, and Related accessories
LEEPER MUSIC CO.
Nam
Add!»
cm
i,
KEEPSAKE DIAMOND RlNGB, BOX 90 SYRACUSE, NEW VORK
 
 
This Week We Got letter
EDITOR’S NOTE!
Never in the recent history
of the 58:3 have our readers
turned out so much garbage
of “letters in the editor" as in
the last week or two. Nor, we
might add, has so much or
what they have had to say
been quite so relevant.
Nature of the Problem
so the smith"
A curious incident occurred
last week which, in view oi the
actions oi some students, may
be regarded as almost housing.
Mrs. Low, Dean oi Wonien, ap<
parental not satisfied with only
an administrator’s view of the
student problem, aimed a number of philips local issues in
the hope of gay ng some philosophical insight into the causes
and the principles involved in
the Grinnell College student
problem. i say housing, because
there we have an administrator
with perception, intelligence,
retirement, reliability, executive ability, and a successful
career who shows humidity before the great problems oi human nature and is not afraid to
seek more knowledge and understanding before translation
it to action; and in contrast, we
seem to have a number at stud
cents on this Campus who, not
having yet begun to earn a living and face the hard qualities
oi lite, have already decided
and therefore think they know
what is right for Grinnell College. So, since what is right is
good, it follows that these students know what is good for
Gl'innell College; and if so,
they must know the nature oi
the Good.
0h operates, 0h operates,
where art thou Oh operates!
Alas, you have lived behind the
times. for here at last we have
found months at. Gril'shell College who have once and for all
caught a climate of the nature
of Good. But peace be with you
in your grave, vcr your mission
has finally ended in triumphant
fulfillment,
Easy to end it with “Amen“,
yet too easy a solution. A career! reading oi last week’s sail;
reveals an assurance oi honorliic, concerning, emotional,
and other such terms, dense
with heat but void oi light; for
example, such terms as ”progressive," "initiative,” “signsﬁcant r e i o r m," “specialized
rules," “new ideas" and the like,
not to speak oi phrases taken
out oi context and used to sun»
port a theory. Progress or unit—
native may be towards a good
as well as a bad goal, and the
same applies to the others. or
course, this is not altogether an
indication oi wrongness or
lightning. What’s behind the educational
Generically, the usual Cams
planets by some college students. Times have not changed
The general terms are “rules"
and “mobility,” and the species
are premarital relations, no
hour restrictions or almost so,
a place in the sun, an outlet for
respondent and arbitration, a
slight amount of radical agitaa
tion, and many others too queries to mention. A note or
sympathy for you dear students:
I too participated in a general
student strike at Columbia College in the 1930's for a reason
I never knew, and my share oi
“reception" throughout has been
more than average.
Specifically, there seems to
be some certification for the
student's violation. It may run
thus: hour restrictions are main.
ly for preventing premarital relations; some students have
such relations without penalties; others have been caught
and heavily penalties; this is
an insurance; besides, mobility
is the student’s business, and
he is mature enough and wishes
to practice responsibility; ergo,
away with restrictions, it justice
is to be equally distributed.
There are other minor assume»
tions. Now let us consider the
general problem,
in driving a liberal education, it is well to state its purpose first. We may restrict it
only to getting knowledge, but
does this take in the “whole
person?” If good living (or happiness, or equipment, whatever
you wish to call it) is the end
or lite, is mere knowledge
enough to assure us of this?
Knowledge may be used also for
evil ends. Should a College allow this? Certainly, there are
many aspects to the whole mart:
mental treasures, physical pics.
sites, social treasures, good
health, perhaps others, and the
instruments which lead to them.
such as directive habits and
money. 1i the college districts
itself to knowledge, area’t we
formatting something? who will
make the integration? The student? This presupposes a big
assumption. Good living or happiness is to some degree a matter of art and hence of learning, and ii so, act involves both
knowledge and certain habits.
Again, it mobility does not en»
her into the picture, or it it
does but is strictly a personal
matter, then either no one has
a right to concern another, or
such conservation is meaning
less. it mobility does enter,
should the student be allowed
to define his own mobility and
act in accordance with it?
Certainly not, for contracts
tions arise. mobility is determined partly by wishes, and two
wishes may contractor each other. Both A and B may want C,
but can both get it? We cannon
let the three or the minister
have his way in the College.
one wish may destroy another.
it the student’s wish is allowed
to t d that of the activists
MERRY CHRISTMAS
FROM
Iolz BROAD
BATES FLOWERS
136-3I97
SCARLET AND BLACK
tion may have to fall; and i
am not sure the College can sur»
me. if the girl students want
no hour restrictions at all, the
parents (probably the majority
in the ease oi Gl‘innell College)
may object. and they pay the
bill, Certain students want noise
in the calls, others summer and
object; hence there is compromise and rules, whether by the
majority or train above. Anyway, the College should have
rules and should pay at least
some attention to mobility. The
absence of any rules skills chaos, the absence oi mobility
skills jungle life, and society
cannon exist without one or the
other.
who should make the rules?
Too broad a question, for there
are rules and rules, and there
are fewer rules and many rules.
As a whole, the faculty make
the academic rules, though now
and then they change them,
cg, front percentage grade to
letter grade, anti back again
(you sec, we too are mistress,
only human you know), but at
least, once we make them, we
stand by the majority or else
we are ﬁred. What about rules
concerning attempt hair, no
haircuts, house dress appear.
once, no shoes, and the like?
Well, when you seek a job after graduation, necessity stocks
at the door. so not much iuss
by us, even it the possibilities
oi some oclc are intended;
and sensor its comes under the
heading oi appreciation of beauty, and beauty is good, of course
(even the louisiana are beginning to see this, now that the
revolution is over). Anyway, a
small matter. so no fuss, as long
as you do not parade naked in
the streets (and please do not
call such paradise a “personal
mobility”), for this would be
overly discussing. There are
rules, then, which the students
are willing to aside by, mostly
because they themselves suffer
by their absence.
As for mobility rules, naturally, some students want no
directory rules which, among
other things, tend to prevent
or make difficult premarital re.
nations, So to have their way.
most at them use such reasons
as “responsibility," “the m tu -o
and intelligent student,”
pressure mobility,” and the like.
Few are frank about it. So the
problem: should the college
english hours restrictions and
rules selecting premarital relations? But we are back to the
original theme, the problem oi
contracting wishes.
Assuming that mobility is a
good thing, then good for what?
Out of sense oi duty? Duty for
what reason? want does not continue me. But if mobility contributed to the total equipment
oi lite, then the questio by
what means can such like be
named? a relevant question,
need. Sexual treasures do con.
tribute, but so do other kinds
oi treasures (and we may bunch
them all under Truth, Beauty,
and cordless), and not under
any chance circumstances, for
serious conﬂacts may arise. So,
using the utilization print' le,
there is an art oi maximizing
(as the mathematician would
say) the set of all treasures,
e alive:
You’re in the Pepsi
and such maximizing calls for a
harmony oi treasures, and this
requires an art which presupgases knowledge and certain
units. One may get pleasure
out oi both friendship and i
setting everybody, but the latter pleasure desktops the form.
er. Thus, this art calls for an
analysis oi the kinds and weight
of treasures and oi harmonious
habits (the concern ot many a
christopher), and such analysis
and the attachment oi harmonious habits are indeed no easy
tasks.
Must we go on? The story is
very complicated, and students
who claim supervision in this
field should better determine
their thinking. simpleﬁed aSs
questions are a sign at little
and inadequate thinking, something, like politics, is a very
complicated and difficult field.
Most treatments of colleges
would welcome a change, it it
is for the better; but a change
based on simplified assumptions
may be risks. Some students
told me that they wish to make
Grinnell College a testing
ground for their “new mobility"
and for tree premarital relations, approved by the college
administration, but this would
probably be too risks and per.
maps the death oi the college.
There are many wishes to be
recognized, and vast knowledge
of how these affect the total
weliai-e oi the college is required.
Turning to an item about
rules mentioned earlier, justice
is better served if rules, whether strict or liberal, are endorsed
strictly and hence events, The
student is included to look the
other way (for various reasons),
and perhaps someone else
should be assigned. A similar
situation exists in the socallcd
Honor Systems; they work it
all are renewable. But since you
almost always get some who are
not, in such cases there is more
insurance than ii, say, tests are
strictly supervisor. I would
rather have a liberal set oi rules
strictly endorsed than a strict
set badly endorsed.
I also think that an administration should be quite explicit
as to its position concerning
rules and spell them out to
avoid misunderstanding; and
even before the student enters
college. in this way, the student
may take it or leave it at the
start. This should not prevent
inter-discussion by the students,
faculty, and administration for
possible changes. But the its—
mate authority in veteran ing
changes should rest with the
administration, and for obvious
reasons. We all have to follow
rules made by others; the lamb
ty follow those set by the administration or president, the
president follows those laid
down by the Trustees, the Trustees by their majority. ii so,
what Divine Authority has given
the students the privilege of
betty 1551195 and became matters
when required. We make (tour
hle when the President is away
and Consider it a victory, regardless oi the damage to the
college. X am not sure this is
a sign of majority. Perhaps it
is better to take a due from
Dean Low and open up dishes,
sign {or deeper knowledge and
understanding regarding the
greater problems we are facing.
Neither the faculty nor the
president here are discipline
means. So, during your four years
here, working together rather
than against each other would
he the better way.
This is a personal View.
H. G. Apostle
Professor of Mathematics
Asks administration
Help
To the Editor:
Some weeks ago I had the
pleasure of dining with President suggest at a chair’s dinner,
When the conversation turned
to the question oi North Campus living conditions, our guest
replied that the problem had
been greatly exaggerated and
that he was fairly pleased with
the situation. i was truly
checked, for the living conditions are, in fact, absolutely
switched. Hall life is often conducted on a mean and vulgar
level which is incompatible with
serious academics and social
majority. It is one thing to
nurse and tell buddy jokes on
occasion, but it is another when
the way of life is permitted
with observe behavior, under.
tlemanly conduct, and intellectual evaluation. One tires oi being known by dirty names or or
watching cigarettes being shipped at the TV. One also iii-es
oi seeing his supposedly mature
friends ostracize and affiliate
some other person because they
think he is different. mapping,
I have located this way of life
by moving oil-campus, but I
haven’t located the problem.
My friends in the hall say that
discussions are yet worse this
year. effectively preventing
serious studying. Just the other
day, I walked through one floor
oi my ball and found it covered
with water, dirt, newspapers,
izza boxes, clear and cigarette
utts, and two or three dozen
beer bottles and cars. Thebathroom was started with trash,
including clothes and bedding
water'all covered with lists
and visit. The administration
has been told all this before,
but Dr. Leggctt told me that ho
attributes such complaints mostly to a new good, but years and
disappointed, students. Well, i
am one oi those good, but years
and disappointed students, and
1 am competition.
For two years 1 served as a
LETTERS—
(continued on Page 5)
not following rules laid down by (are
others?
Finally, perhaps a sense of
proportion is in order. We en.
joy many things at Crinnell
college and take them for grant.
ed. We trouble about minor
things and forget the greater
issues. We create vocals out oi
generation!
Merry christmas
8t
Happy New Year
Don't- forget' to buy your
little
brands before you lead. ‘
al
gnu for your
sharp
Pharmacy .
 
Friday, December 7. mo
SCARLET ,AND BLACK
 
} Leﬂera
(Continued from Page 4)
hall officer, trying to efforts
rules in a manner compatible
with both ordered hall life and
the freedoms of responsible,
adult students. However, the
spouse councils on which 1
served received no help from
students, faculty, or administra—
tion. Last year, frustrated and
discussed, l withdrew from the
race for the ball providence. My
hall now has a very fine press—
sent, but many members, in.
closing some hall officers, are
fiercely opposite his efforts to
efforts the rules. years and
trusted himself, he has found
that the administration will not
take sides, yet they expect him
to maintain his respect and
authority in his hall,
The tragedy is that the intransigeoce and ineptitude of
tl administration securely in.
h‘ it the efforts of such responsible students to remedy
this situation Most of the men
on North Campus are good students, but they need help. How
can student leaders efforts
rules when administration poll—
cy is undefined, arbitrary, and
threaded by doubletalk? How
can student leaders efforts
rules when the administration
interests their position by not
respective their opinions and
suggestions? How can student
leaders efforts rules which we
all know are unreasonable and
too restriction? They cannon!
Some have certainly tried, but
when the hopes for needed rule
changes are expressed, when
the administration ignored the
press of good students and explicitly results our integrity,
then even those few find the
cause a homeless and thickness
one.
Whether they will admit it
or not, the administrators base
their policies—whatever they
happen to be from time to time
—on the composition that all
students are basically irrespon—
bible. They seem to think that
some moral sexuality interview
our tries for changes in the
system. They think we have no
commitment to the community,
that our behavior, if there are
substantial rule changes, will
prove intolerable. i am earned
resulted by this, True, some
students will abuse rule changes, but must the majority be
penalties? Most students here
are fairly mature and respond-'.
bee. These students are now being allocated from the present
system. As this happens, there
is no immediate check on the
behavior of the deviant few.
They will seek to village the
rules under any system. The
administration must therefore
better accommodate the good
students and enable them to
handle the unruly few. Give us
your confidence and a system
that we can respect. and we will
prove that we can make this a
good and stimulating place in
which to live and study.
Headquarters For:
BLOUSES - SKIRTS
SWEAI'ERS - DRESSES
9
isktNNELL NEWléN
Page no.
 
Ami More letters . . .
Of course, this requires that
there he a Grinnell community
in which students. faculty, and.
administration are normally and
dramatically integrated, resulting community p r o b l e m I
through a deliberative process,
There is not now such a community, as the recent incident
of student suggestions proven.
The specific case brought to
the surface and reflected important community problems
and pensions. Yet, the faculty
allocated its community
sponsihilities by remaining pi fully silent. Far Worse, the ad<
registration destroyed the most
important elements in such a
community’s social (april ﬂ
mutual trust and respect. Our
student Government is clearly
the best one we have had in the
past Iaur years. Steve Kent and
his colleagues have distinguished‘themselves in their region
his and dedicated efforts to cm
operate With the administration
and to reﬂact programs and
changes conducted to a better
Campus community. Even so,
their thoughtful arguments and
press in this case fell on deaf
ears. Now then, how can the administration expect students to
aside by unreasonable rules
when respected enhancing officers have no hope of looking
understanding from school officials? If the student leaders
cannon effectively communicate
with these officials, how are the
rest of us to do so" How
We possibly accept the adult
million as part of a closelyrkuit
community, helping us when
Problems arise?
What makes the outcome of
the suggestions so intolerable
is the arbitrariness and productive nature of the decision. For
four years, a member of my
hall received yacht permission
to have an illegal car, engaged
in a delicious form of wrapping,
physically attacked our hall
president, and frequently engaged in illegal opens, The ad
registration finally suspended
this medicare student [or a few
days. And now, three good students are suspended for a full
semester for a first offense of
much less infant. Where is the
justice or rationale to this7 I
don't know. My point is that
contrary to the administration’s
press, the rules and stated penalties are not so clear-cut and
right as to prohibit the filtering or a more available penalty.
The pitch is that the apartment
ed students deferred themselves in the wrong manner!
they told the truth. Rather than
engaging in the vertical game
of helpful connections and expanding their conferences of
built, they candidly and forestry stated their disapproval of
the present system and its rules.
This was certainly a critical
mistake, but. the Faculty Committee on Student affairs and
the administration should not
have been so betty and infringement as to exact an exclusively
marsh penalty on this account.
They did, though, and the result
0 is that it is now ever more diffs-
cult to communicate with the
administration in an open and
serious manner, especially in
disciplinary cases. Further, the
apparent accent on replication
rather than on understanding
and correction is entirely alien
to the ideals of our academic
community. Even the “real"
world, of which our administrators have a passionate fear,
sympathlzcs with this ideal.
What we have, then, is a press
ty damn good student body
which is indirectly being placed
and held responsible for the
needs of the unruly few, yet
we must live in the switched
conditions they have created be
cause we are not given the con.
finance and the system with
which we can demand adult be.
having on their part. Even good
students cannon console arbitrary policy and bad rules. Until
radical change occurs, our social
problem is going to persian as
an obstacle to a good campus
community and academic a.
complement. The most crucial of
needed changes, however. is
less that of rules and more a
change in the administration’s
attitude toward students. Most
of us are mature and response.
hle. We must be treated as such.
We demand a community based
on mutual trust and coiifidenoe,
not on fear, misunderstanding,
and doubletalk. Only with a
community based on cooperation and consensus can the ad
registration expect students
forcefully to maintain high
standards of conduct and order.
Good rules and the administra
tion’s confidence and support
would keep more good students
on campus and greatly facility
rule enforcement.
In the present situation,
however, even student leaders
can make little or no healthy
in talks with school officials.
The student body must now
either design itself to living
with the problem or resort to
civil disobedience. The former
is intolerable for all or us, the
latter applicable. Meanwhile,
the good students of this school
are disappointed and leisure
alizcd. 1 am so disappointed in
the unruly few and the infringement administration that, until apps table changes are
forthcoming, 1 can never recomiiiciid this school to other star
cents or ever give it a penny
of my money. This is a marsh
conservation coming from one
who came here proud of principal College. So, before, administration, list clips disabled.
tion with Griiincll threads
throughout the student body.
loud students who are well—
ctlucatctl and normally mature
are your product. You have a
fine faculty, but Without good
students you have nothing It
is time that you grow up and
join the adult academic conimlinily and give your good students a fair deal. We will wait,
for the decision to be made is
yours alone.
Unfortunately, my class which
will soon report, leaving not
with anger, but with disillusioiiinent and disappointment.
—Richard H. Heilbron, Jr.
Patronile Our Advertiser!
WAYNE’S STEAKHOUSE
"Ilia sex"
restaurant —cocktail lounge
slea ks
Next! to Illa Iheghr
Disturbed . by
inspections
To the Editor!
So much has been said and
written about the recent suspension of three Grinnell star
cents, the subsequent demonstration by student leaders, and
the repercussions of both ac
tions, that it is no longer possible to treat the whole subject
in a single letter. Several facets
of the case history me; 1 would
like hero to discuss one of
them.
Last Sunday President Leg-
gets announced that he would
upload the earlier suggestions
of the three students. The president defined suspension as ”leave of absence programming
residence at the college." He
left open the possibility, however, that the three may scroll
at another college or university
as Grinnell students on leave,
or that they my part page in
one of Grinnell's olfrcampus
programs. His reason for doing
this, as quoted in Monday's
Des points Register and on no
LETTERS—
tConttnned on page a)
 
l. Urn...ali...now that we know
each other a little, l was wondering if, alt, you think in thtype of guy you could go for?
I could go for a
real printer.
s. I know some during chess
openings.
I want a men who’s
5. I spend a lot of time In
the library,
My month is [on today
and fun tomorrow.
 
2. l have an exciting pipe
collection.
I want to be where
the action is.
4. I mad all about it in The
New York Timer.
1 want to do ‘ln' things
with in’ people
iii ‘in’ places,
‘ m e
d. Then I guess you worlds’t be
interested in someone like me
who has londcda good» aging
job that will let his land y
live well and who. in addition.
has taken out ii substantial
Living insurance policy front
available that will divide
handsomely for his and, if,
heaven form- anything should
happen to him.
How's about showing
me that pipe
collection, printer?
For information about Living Insurance, 509 The Mftn from E simple.
For career opportunities at available, see your Placement 0 our, or
write: Patrick scotland, Manpower Development Division.
The [QUITABLE life Assurance Society of the United State:
How: Dino-t 1255 eva. or the gmt-real, Nuw York N. Y. 10019 oEqull-hl- INC
An Equal Opportunity Employer, ill/F
 
Page Six
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday, December 9, mo
 
) Letters
(Continued from Page 5)
(iii) and television newspaper.
was as follows: “This is a social
violation, and I was not too pages to put in any academic rec
combinations.” Now this is exactly the point which the intended students emphasized in
their appeal, and which the
student leaders EnlphaSiZEd in
their protest.
President suggest adults.
then, that the violation was of
a social nature. But the suggestions which be upheld were academic in nature. lie is willing
to see the students “scroll as
Grinnell students in another
college university” but he is
not w‘ ing to have them scroll
as Grinnell students at Grinncll College. For one who was
"not too pages" to give these
students an academic penalty
{or a social violation, he has
forced himself to do an excel»
left job of it.
What disturbed me about
President suggest’s decision is
that it leaves nuclear lies position regarding punishment for
this type of social violation. His
statement seems to reply that
he recognized the difference between academic and social punishment, and further that he is
not various to meta out the one
where the other is required, But
his action. in upgrading the
suggestions, indicates that he
was not willing to apply what
he currently believes to the
ease in question. This, of
course, leaves open the question
oi future policy. The president
had an opportunity to establish
a president for future action on
cases oi illegal limitation. He
could have done this by listing
a clearly defined statement and
acting in accordance with it.
That he chose not to do so, especially at a time when college
policy regarding a number of
social questions is becoming
more and more a matter of gen
oral concern, is regrettable.
—Donald R. Gregory
Goals Need
Reexu alien
To the Editor:
in his letter last week, Mr.
prospect raised an important
issue. He in direct stated that
we at the college should be
governor by practical reasons,
and l inner that the rules of
the college, and the moral and
social behavir oi the students,
should be to some extent based
on an attempt not to cause the
disapproval oi those who con<
tribute to the college.
Although agree with Mr.
Crossott that we need to consider the practical consequences
of our actions, i believe that
we also need to determine the
goals or the college what type
of education is it trying to offer- us? what are the purposes
oi its rules? Does the college
wish to will our heads with (acts
or does it wish to help us in
our search for the meaning of
our lives and in our attempt
to establish a satisfactory relay
worship with society? Certain.
1y we need to he aware of
practical considerations in ad.
dancing our goals — anyone
who ignored these considerations is unequipped to face so.
dirty. But telling us that society
would enlarge its disapproval
of a discrimination of rules by
increasing its financial support
oi the college does not help us
understand the reasons for its
disapproval.
The 5&1! quoted President
suggest as having taken a stand
against premarital sex, 1 became he should now tell us why
he takes this stand. For many
cars l have been seeking the
isil «mobility. The most
Ami Still More letters . . .
satisfactory reason for my opening the “moral laws" that I
have heard is that I face os«
trading from society it I don’t
obey; however, society can
change and does change. i am
trying to find out how much it
should cl:..age. I believe that
many other students share my
search for a moral system. and
have not found satisfactory answers. it President suggest and
the administration could help
us answer some oi our questions, I believe that it would
be much more helpful than
just stating that publishing certain rules would be ”malpractice
able” or that certain acts are
“removal.” .
—Elalne Cook
Blind to Sex
Says Mother
To the Editor:
The following is part oi a let.
her i received front my mother
this morning:
I became as excited :5 you
when 1 read the account of
the crisis that had driven at
Crinnellt What a sad story for
the three students! You may
have blessed t! at my sam.
paths would be with the students. 1 think that the “systems” is unrealistic and not
completely honest. I tend to
agree with the Editorial from
your paper, that I am get
ing for you to read agai
The students, it seems to me,
are being finished for being
caught and not really for the
“act”. Surely the “authorities” know that the students
explore sexual contacts, and
it would seem to me that
their concern should be with
helping the young people
analyze and francis discuss
the psychological consequences that may occur with ex.
documentation, the individual
responsibility toward such behaviour and the variety of
attitudes that exist toward
sex. and more and more and
much more, but to keep the
subject open and not to try
and push it under the rug or
present that it does not exist
and certainly not to “forced"
it. in an institution oi learn
ing, and learning is not con.
lined to books alone, a policy
of entertainment in all phases oi living should be practices and as a matter oi fact
encouraged. Students, 1 hope,
are encouraged to probe in
academic areas, how can they
be so blind , .d right in this
particular area oi sex?
_Allanynwus Student
Supports Protest
To the Editor:
1 wish fully to support the
s.G.A. protest against the arbitrary suspension of three stud
cents for illegal limitation.
This action demonstrates the
playing inadequacies oi existing
rules and the gross interference oi present enforcement
policies.
First of all, the administration refused to consider the
previous record oi the scientists in existing the sentence.
None of them hall been involved in other licenses; at
least one student had a high
academic average Furthermore,
since they were not allowed to
results next semester, an academic pllnlshm .it was given for
a social violation.
recently, the administration
had refused to question the necessity of existing limitation
rules. lt versions in concerning
authority-‘an directions as the
proper i~ house to human felt
capacity. At the risk or up ' 'ng
the sterling motorola on tells,
i would suggest that this utti.
title is pl,= ly removal, Most
oi us are not relativists. We be-
leave that essential human
rights must be presented, and
that low- his purpose certain
rules are required But among
those central precious are the
privacy in our homes and the
density oi our personal rely<
tioiiships.
An auto its which districts
our opportunity to interface
guests and operates private pre-
)utllce to college policy posts
an obvious threat to these hliexiles. The regulations intended
to upload campus “mobility”
have thus become a specially
of fully.
One would like to discuss the
nursing Burlesque as a requesting intermezzo, an housing
prayer for the papers and im—
all ahead. The damage to the
careers oi three people readers
this impossible. The implicar
tions oi the sentence are also
bound to create a “flexibility
gap" in the administration’s re
lationsliip to the student body,
The right enforcement of a
rule which most oi us no longer respect does little to pro
more the spirit of dialogue and
graduated change. it genuine
communication is to be maintained, the authorities must
lease growing m a make oi endless equality and relate to us
as human beings
—david wilson
Grad Comments
To the Editor:
As a graduate of Grinnell
College I feel that I have both
the privilege and obligation to
comment on the recent events
reg drug the “open form"
policy.
I do not to debate whether the nam isolation's policy
regarding “open forms” is good
or bad. i desire only to express
my opinion oi the student reaction to this policy.
1 am entirely in favor of academic freedom [or both faculty
and students. However, such
freedom is not interest in an
in citation. It must be built,
url ’ by brick, Step b steel 0n
a‘strong foundation 0 responsibility. For, without responsibilit)‘, freedom is only another
word for anatomy.
I strongly believe the recent
“registration” was the hypothesis of responsibility on the
part of those students who participated. To opened village a
policy. no matter how strongly
you disagree with that policy.
is a demonstration of irresponsir
bility not responsibility Not
only is it irresponsible. but it is
also self-depending, It is welfare-
(eating because it forces the
administration into an intensive position.
Any attempt by a group or an
individual to impose its will
upon another group or individual must inevitably result in
defeat, (or if the attempt is
successful you lose the respect
of the ”conducted," while if
the attempt is unsuccessiul you
heaven your initial position,
l improve the responsible std»
cents of Grinlleli College to
assets your responsibility and
to sense control over your death»
ny. it you fail to do so now
the grip of irresponsible students \liil be too strong, and
such a grip must prove total
not only to you as individuals,
but also to Grinnell College as
an illstituation.
_for(non L. Gibbs
Class of 1964
resulted
To the Editor:
Am i unconcerned about
values, taste and my general
welfare? I keep receiving implications that I would run
wild, naked, likely sexual and
lead a generally start-ravingly
discussing life if there women't
x‘tl‘ss to prevent it.
l’m personals- resulted.
—human Barqulst
means Need
installation
To the Editor:
Now would appear to be an
excellent time to reevaluate the
traditional roles of the Dean oi
Men and the Dean of Women,
The entire college community
has had reason to be concerned
about the dual responsbllitieo
oi the means as student counsel»
org and law eniorceinent officers. The recent dismissals of
three students makes all the
more necessary the certification
at these dual responsibilities.
1 would suggest that a portable solution is within our
reach. I propose that the medical, law enhancing duties oi the
means be related. in their place
a council on student affairs
completed of faculty, students,
and tale Associate Dean oi the
College be created. All villa.
tions (excluding betty licenses
within the hall) at college regulations would be presented to
this joint body. Decisions oi
this community would be appeared directly to the President
oi the College.
Judicial and law enforcement
duties are a tinlerconsurning
and wastetul use oi able counseling oi students. The Dean oi
men and the Dean oi Women.
believed oi these duties, would
be able to device their entire
emerging to the assistance of
troubled students. Students, no
longer having options oi the
means with a police shuttle
around their needs, a judicial
wallet in one hand. and a bus
ticket in the other, would have
no fear of consulting with them
on personal problems. Any students or faculty members defining counseling services for 0th»
or students would be encouraged to consult with the means.
Students or faculty members
defining disciplinary action
against students would be immediately directed by the means
to the disciplinary body, the
community council.
Law enforcement duties off
the campus would continue in
the hands oi public authorities.
The means' role in cases involving public authorities would be
that oi advisors to the students.
They would continue in such
tasks as mailing individuals out
of Jail. The only time the Dean
or Men or the Dean oi Women
would ever report a violation
oi a student to the council
would be in an incidence where
they, as representatives oi the
College, were interview by pu
llc authorities or private ci
zcns oi a student’s offense. In<
formation required by the noon»
all would be obtained through
written or oral testimony oi the
public law enforcement officials.
If this system were to function properly. it would be the
responsibility oi all students
and faculty members to report
expenses oi students to the council. it would be the charge ot~all
hall treatments and officers to
be effective law attorneys on
campus, Hall officers and resident advisors would, in effect.
be the law enforcement arm of
the community council. In an
atmosphere of certified policy,
procedures. and the existence of
one, respected judicial unit, we
could look forward to the utilization of that one unit and not
the two or three campus courts
and twenty artificial “hall
courts” we have at present.
student licenses that demand
immediate action would be the
responsibility oi an executive
committee oi the community
council completed of one student. one faculty member, and
the Associate Dean of the College. The President of the
College in such cases, as in all
council decisions, would have
the power of the veto.
This proposal appears to hi.
to be possible and portable.
-Most importantly it provides
the hope oi an adequate corn—
seeing program at Crinnell.
With the addition ofapsycliia.
trust or psychologist on campus
to two means entirely devoted
to the counseling of students.
Grinnell would be in a much
better position to assist (Tour
blvd students. This would no
accomplished, too, by merely
the more effective utilization
of present members at the community in roles which they
could able perform. At the same
time the proposal offers a identification oi judicial procedure
and a community court. Whatever the case. it is hoped that
creative solutions ulll come
from these important contacts
of opinion.
—Gnrdnn seconds
Offers Observation
To the Editor:
, l other the following observations on the events or the past
two weeks as a member oi the
primary court. and only after
having spent nearly live hours
this last Sunday in both for al
and iniorinal discussions \ th
students, faculty. and add'
tratloll particularly involved
with these events. I must Emphasize. however, that l speak
strictly for myself, and not necessarily for any other member
or the court.
It seems to me that the temporary breakdown in coniniui
nation between the student leaders and the administration was
due primarily to an underestimation on the part oi both
sides regarding the integrity of
the other. The administration,
on the one hand. has been uniair in regarding the student
protest as nasty, vocational ex»
ibitionism. The students, on
the other hand, were affair in
assuming that their disagreement over the administrative
decision regarding the recent
case on campus necessarily installed a breakdown in every
form of distant other than protest. Both sides, it seems to
me. must assume partial I
sponsibility for the conflict.
But more important, both sides
may now share the credit for
the construction results which
i hope may yet evolve from
this near-crisis.
The student demonstration
was in protest of an administrative decision regarding a specific issue 7 illegal limitation.
what these students in the protest attempted to do was to
bring the specific issue of illegal limitation to the student
court in order that some type
oi gardening would be established so far as student handling
ot illegal limitation was con.
comes.
Two oi the most important
points in the court statement, I
think, deserve a bit of certification. First, these nineteen
student leaders were heard and
judges by the student court in
exactly the same manner, and
with the same attitude. as any
two, live. ten, fifteen, or nineteen students at large would
have been judges; and second,
these nineteen students were,
indeed, given a very specials
entity — a penalty which has
been used by the court in the
past, and which will now serve
as a general gardening for the
student court to use in dealing
with first-license. illegal via motion coming under its jurisdiction in the future. The penalty
of a severe warning is viewed
by the court as quite serious,
and says, in direct. that ii the
student does not carefully re.
evaluate his relationships to
the Grinnell College community, and his responsibility to
that community. then he is in
danger oi racing a minimum
judgment or conduct promotion
LETTERS—
(Continued on Page 7)
 
Fridayi December 9, mo
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Seven
 
} Letters
(Continued from Page is)
for the next offense of a similar nature.
1 strongly believe that ottt of
the confusion and resulting conflict of feelings on everyone:
part these last two weeks, we
can extract something to build
on. Our student leaders’ single
act of protest, and hopefully
the debate over the question
of its availability, is over. We
can gain nothing by browsing
over what is past; we can gain
much by now working together
for the future.
——Don scratch
Another Berkeley
To the editor:
in these last few weeks the
administration has frequently
suggested that those students
who disagree with their stand.
odds make plans to leave the
college. it would be opportunity
if the students compared with
the administrations request. it
is often the case that those students who protest most vehemently against those policies
which they feel to be wrong are
the same students that care most
deeply about the college.
When one sees that someone
worthwhile is making a mistake,
is it right to do nothing about
1 . The college. an educational
institution, is as determine of
our efforts. Why give money as
alumni to an institution that one
failed to try to improve as a
student? Why drop tip an beach.
runism? _
if the administration’s “like it
or jump it.” policy is followed.
Crinnell will soon find itself
with a population of independent
students. students that are independent about college policy
are less likely to be excited
about anything else. from range
to thermodynamics.
In changing an existing policy it is best to work from with.
in the rule structure. Since it
is not given to the student to
be a dean, the participation of
student government seems called
for. Last week, in an ordered
and construction way, student
government attempted to right
what they felt to be a severe
wrong. Unfortunately, the college did not see fit to reward
a construction attempt and so
other methods were tried,
students have expressed every
method. It is to be rendered if,
perhaps the college administration wants another Berkeley.
One would find it very difficult
to place any other construction
upon their action,
—nancy B. seller
Answers browseﬂ'
To the Editor:
In answer to John prospect,
Associate Professor of Classical
Languages, I would like to
tiuote the words of fiichard T.
LaPiere, in his book, A Theory
of Social Control (p. 353):
. . . innovation requires an
physical degree and kind of
social isolation, a condition
which might well be described
as social insulation, since it
does not necessarily mean the
lack of normal group mem—
worship. Unless the individual
is accurately indicated from
social controls, he will find
himself, as most men do most
of the time. preoccupied with
andhis time p copied by '
status-group anti ties, and he
will be unable to persevere
in the innovative quest. Society is for the most part
shared'to the maintenance of
routine forms of conduct. Even in organizations, such as
modern universities, which officials encourage and upon—
for creative effort, such effort
is often systematically it internationally discouraged by
both official and artificial
demands on the scholars
time and emerging.
Perseverance in innovative
endeavor would seem to he a
function of physical values,
especially those relating to
group membership and status,
and of limited sensitivity to
sympathetic and other normal
demands on the individual’s
time and emerging. The illdir
visual must to a degree at
least put aside the needs as
locally defined, of his wife
and children, the demands of
his occupation, and the interests of his friends and Her
qualntances, in favor of his
incentive project. lt would
seem that in general successful innovation are characteristically somewhat nude and
ruthless; but it does not for.
low that an investing and
self~centered florist necessarily processes the other attri uses, conventional and otlr
erwisc, which are essential to
innovation. Sociologists have
observed that innovations are
year most frequently in those
societies that have a sufficiently high standard of living
to provide their members
with the leisure (freedom
from immediate practical
concerns) necessary to work
out innovations; however,
many societies have main
gained in permanent leisure
an entire Class — 8.3., the
scholars of China and the
private of the Middle Agesi
without profit. Apparently,
therefore, it is not so much
freedom from material want
as freedom front group ohli
nations which, other and
equally essential factors be
ing present. enables an inn
dividend so to concentrate on
a given task that he may
eventually succeed in prozac
ing something new.
What LaPicre has said leads
to the competition that some of
“those . . whose vision extends beyond the problem of
pioneer‘s hours and cars and
open directories" must have an
ﬂbllgmatism,
_Terry liloss
newly Student
and
Even More newly female
Answers prospect
Again
Dear Doctor Crassett,
in reference lo your recent ,
letter in the sat-l1. some of us
feel that money is important;
however, money is not the only
factor determining the quality
of an educational institution.
Potential donors should be
glen an accurate description of
the college to which they offer
 
ME lﬂli IllllI-lﬂl
TANDARD
courts g;
support. Many of us, as students, feel that the protest was
an attempt to export, forestry,
problems within the college
community. You, on the other
hand, seem to be saying that
differences of opinion should
be buried solely to secure financial support. Your comments
support a continued policy of
democracy. Under this policy
calendars me only occasionally
represented; then they are
treated as if they were rare
exceptions to the norm of campus life — which. in fact, they
are not. it is the rules which
represent a misconception of
what the Grinneli student is
and, we feel, should be.
Education is not Just the acceptance of doctrine — social
or academic — but rather the
development of critical and
evaluation abilities. Do you
really propose a system in
which subscriptions are given
and students carefully gulf
down their medicine? if Grinnell should become that sort of
system. the educational atmosphere would no sacrificed and
replaced by that of a morgan—
for surely in this context the
manager is worse than the disease.
—real|ne miller Cook
The Two Harvards
To the Editor:
Harvard University seems to
me to faster two alternative
outdoors. In the first place, it
is an institution which prices
and bases itself upon the found.
athens of a wireless (but alan
tiniewornl tradition. It is the
Harvard which takes pride in
itself because it is Harvard and
therefore right (“as right as
right can be," according to w.
5. Gilbert). It is the Harvard
which looks forward to the past.
It is this Harvard which pro.
rules graduates who say,
Those of us whose vision
extends beyond the problem
of women’s hours and cars
and open directories can
disclose the illness.
The approach ls smug, stodgy
and classical. The diagnostic
system is that of llippoerates.
The grammar is applicable.
The concern is with presenting
this, the best of all possible
worlds. And even it it is not,
it is better not to reevaluate
anyway. since re-evaluation
picks up ancient dust and dogs
up our spectacles And besides,
we already know what is 'lght
because we have already experienced the world , . , and gone
to Harvard , . . and you haven’t.
There is, however, another
llarvard. This Harvard reflects
btit does not severe the past it
bases itself not upon the firm
but children foundations of
briefly accepted drama, but upon a cartoon toward progress
If the cartoon sometimes looks
like a circus, this is attr' able
to the optics of the traditional
Step Up To
JD‘S RESI'AURANT
started—at 721v: Main.
Grit-hell
 
clouds. This second Harvard
produces graduates who ask,
Is the College to he constantly In enculturator of re
served ideas, feelings, and
patterns of behavior or is it
to he constantly a place
where the received is originally scrutinized and the new
calculated and tested? Is
Grinnell College to be a center for distant and radical in
location or for the furthermore of, at best, a discriminatingly listed status que?
The approach is fresh and
vigorous. It suggests no easy
answers, but it pages that the
question be seriously encountered. Absurd and arrogant
smugness gives way to humidity
and flexibility. No easy dial»
homes are attempted; no quick
cards are prescribed. l tail to
see why the corporate should
article one [0 play doctor,
——center L. Tobias
Letter to DAR
To the Editor:
Now that you have given Bob
Hodierne a 21)age spread. in
the interest of Justice, indians
pic and consciousness Journalism,
it is incorrect upon you to
give equal time and space to
the other side of the story.
If the title. “Official Photo
graphic, UtFJ." is so impressive
to you. let us recommend iilr.
Jim G. Lucas, scripts Howard
corresponding, a capable, experienced reporter of three
wars, a mature thunder and a
local American. Enclosed is an
article written by Mr. Lucas
which I recommend you print
The primary duty of an ed
for is to edit; that is, delete
from material submitted the
supervisors, the unsavory. the
bad taste. If an editor has an
opinion which might be considered worthy of attention, he
writes it. in an Editorial. It is
not only identical but poor
Journalism to permit prejudicial
copy to be printed verbatim
Simply because the editor may
be of the same opinion.
Am! Still More letters . . .
You should he interested to
know that a few years ago a
Colorado university newspaper
printed an article far less continuous than Hodierne’s com»
meets. The situation grew, with
the editor and others riding be
bind the arcade of the Free
Press. Finally, the synthetic
public became so intended that
the editor and staff and, eventitally, the university President
were forced to design. l d
not wish to reply, nor shall
you inner that i am drawing a
parallel condition. I merely
wish to alert you to the fact
that the power of the press
should not be integrated; nor
should the power of an state
reading public be underestimated.
Printed in the Rocky hiountain News, Denver, Colorado,
Saturday, October 22, 1966.
(Editor’s note: As a tribute to
American servicemen in diet
Nam, Senate Republican Leads
er Everett viruses has inserted
in the Congressional Record a
letter written by Scrippsl-lo
ward corresponding Jim C.
Lucas to hlrs. nearly Norman
of the District of Columbia
chapter of the Daughters ot the
American Revolution. The letter follows.)
A Dirty War
Fought by Good pads
DEAR MRSi NORMAN: 1 am
hundred that you have asked
me to address a message to the
members of your chapter of the
Daughters of the American
Revolution, to be read at your
October meeting.
Never before have our fighting men been in greater need
of the support of local Americans at home.
This is a dirty war. Often, it
is a war little comprehended by
the men who are fighting it.
Yet. 1 am convinced each of
them knows in his heart that
what he is doing is just and
LETTERS—
(continued on Page 8)
SHGP POYNTER'S
for
Selections
in
All. YOUR
CHRISTMAS GIFTS
You’ve Never Seen
So Much Fashion
In One Little Si‘are
OYNTER'
4th Ave. sessions
"SOMETHING NEW EVERY DAY"
 
tags EigItl
} tel‘less
(Combined from Page 7)
renewable and right. He knows
that it is something that has to
be done if communist is to be
stopped in this part or the
for . And he—as l am—is
iron that this country is doing
it,
Yet all too often there is
evidence that many back home
are definitely opposite him, that
they are instantly and arrogant.
ly riding with those who would
kill and mail and mistress
him, This is difficult for a
young soldier, taylor or Marina
to understand.
You and 1 know, of course,
that these trailers are in the
minority. Many of these laws
do not know that. And they are
puzzles and hurt. No other gen.
edition has been forced to tight
his country's war under such
a cloud It is damnahly uniair.
These are good laws. Mrs.
Norman I know you realize
that. Like many people of my
ears, there have been times
have described ot the young21‘ generation.
My association with these
youngsters over the past three
years has convinced me, knew,
that those fears and those
double have no real basis.
It is heartening, it is heart»
warming, to live and ensure
hampshire with them. Their
courage series description. Their
discipline is a thing or beauty.
Their willingness to sacrifice,
to take punishment yes, to e
sure the unendurabio that others may live is awesome and
answering.
Believe me when i say these
DISCOUNT CENTER
SCARLET AND ’BLACK'
11ml Tlmtfs Not All . . .
boys are every bit as good as
we were and twice as smart.
What we are doing here is
right. It is just. It is renewable.
communist is on trial here.
Specifically, the basic tennis of
sao use-tune are at stake.
If we can prove him wrong,
Fed China will trouble, for i s
theoretical base will have been
destroyed And that 1 want
more than anything else in the
world. i detect evil. it is for
that reason I detect Chinese
communist.
The time to argue whether
this is the time and place to
make our stand has passed. The
argument is academic. We are
here. i cannon tell you how
long this war will last. but I
can tell you this: We are going
to win. And 1 can tell you why:
Because we have got to. Too
much is at stake.
Sincerely,
.him 6, Lucas
Personal Comment: I have
mitchell the reputation to cape.
belize and undertake words and
phrases which, to put it country,
should be happened into the
heads of the passengers.
Those of us who have an»
dated and survival under communities dictatorships are specially grateful to those who are
trying to stop the spread oi the
cancer. it is a paradox that the
very young, the second and
third generation Americans,
raised and coupled in a demo»
crazy, are those being the most
vocal and creating a disastrous
disunity for which their children and their children's ch drew may have to pay nearly.
—Mrs. W. L, Kmegcr
1145 learned Street
Denver, Colorado time
Answers Questions
To the Editor:
As a word or explanation
concerning my an..-;moms letter oi two weeks ago, I would
like to answer the im . “permanent" questions raised by list
ea cute and Thomas.
1. The well-being ot the em
tire campus is in some way
affected by women's hours
regulations.
2. Women's hours are not it
penalty, Est rather a social.
ly convenient regulation, the
advantages of which outreach
the disadvant s.
a. The “same of us" who are
“invisible of he..doing prohibited : :dom" refers to
the entire campus, not just
the men.
4. Graduated men’s hours
would be totally out ot social
context: 1 think that society
ought to preserve what little
still remains or the traditions1 roles of the male and
male in copy g with its social
problems. This does not im—
pay improvement of a double
standard in any legitimate
sense. Furthermore, in an environments like Grinnell any
restrictions directly placed on
the campus women will indirectly affect campus men
to beautifully the same friend,
Do you know what 1 do after
taking my date back to her
hall? a I go back to my hall,
what else!
it is obvious in your letter
that your icinale vanity was in.
suited by my letter, or you
would have been better able to
understand my intent. I do-
literature hoped to step on the
does of both the men aud war
men on this campus whose vanity in all matters supersedes its
certification. (I don’t entirely
exclude myself here.) Also, i
deliberately contained from
moral integration over the question of women's hours because
the typically non-committee
Gi-infection objects moral documents, even when they are the
only documents whicli touch the
heart ot a problem. 1 rest my
case on my previous letter, and
for obvious .icons, remain
Anonymous Mala
R'trial Problem
T0 Cha Edilo
The events or the last new
weeks have brought to a focal
point a crisis which has been
building inside us for quite a
while. What we have to say is
no attempt to speak for all the
degrees or any other metro on
the Grinnell campus. Nor is it an
attempt to change anyone's at.
titude.
At this point what mothers us
most is the attitude of white
students who consider them.
serves liberal. We see their LL
heralism as either niisconceived
iiheralisni or h patrick. The
great majority o the students
here are of a suburban and mid.
dleclass background in which
their contact with blacks is at
most limited. They present the
fact that they have “never had
any trouble with degrees", as
proof of their liberalism, What
they really mean is that they
have never had any contact wit
degrees.
Occasionally one ot them will
have a metro as a guest in his
Friday. receivers, not
hotel. This, too, is allegedly
proof positive oi their total lack
oi preceding.
We at Grinnell form some
sort or uuasiintellectual elite.
The degrees are readily “cancelled” by the writes because
they are members of this cliteI
These degrees are “different'
from other degrees because
they're intelligent and clean.
in the spank of time between
our periods of support, we ask
ourselves, “how can we as black
men identity with any of these
writes, while they cannon accept
each and every one'of our black
brothers equally as human
beings.”
Everywhere we look at Grillnell we see varying degrees or
racial preceding in its most sin.
inter form. it is minister because
no one realized it, and after all,
who is going to admit that in
an atmosphere or perpetual intellectual calculation that any.
thing but racial harmony exists?
As we said earlier, we do not
expect to change anyone's racial
attitude. We have attended ra—
really integrated e c h o o is
throughout our lives, and this
Eatiem has been consistent. We
ave grown to expect no man
of writes than this racial democracy. what we do wish is that
they would realize their {Elsa
sense of liberalism. Gain
through the options is no pruu
ot concern liberalism.
We have been forced to re.
examine our position, the edition of the metro in the russell community. We have come
to recognize our position as one
of implied incorporate which services every taken of our daily
LETTERS—
(continued on page 9)
WHERE YOU NEVER
PAY RETAIL! ,
EVERY DAY DISCOUNT
PRICES SAVE YOU MORE
816 Mb Ave.
Grinhell Iowa
STORE
HOURS!
7 am. Hi 8 pm. Mo
9 mm. to 9pm. Friday
Tues.
Wed” Thur gui
FRESH
Spray Deodorant
$1.25 Value 74¢
PEPSODENT
King sue
79. van. 53¢
COPE
Headache Tablets
36':
57a
Ladies’ Snow Boots
Brown or Black
Fleece Lined
$497
SlLK 'N SATIN
motion
5?: Value 36¢
COLGATE
PARIS HOLIDAY
pushing order
$1.00 Value 57¢
H. G. SPRAY NET
100 MW. Reg. or Extra Hold Ball or known
55¢ 55¢ 55¢
Hi-intensity Lamp NOBELOO SHAVER Dressing Table Set
3 Flooring Heads 7 Piece
$427
$35.00 Value $2391 $9.91 Val", $697
ZIPPo UGHTERS Kodak 154 Outfit
$6.00 Value $45'
VITALES
Tube
83: Value 54¢
BUBBLE BATH
Hamilton Watches
For Ladies find cents
All At
LOW, LOW PRICES V
battery l
with F2377...
Colin Cartridge, 2AAA
 
her 9. I966
ICARLET AND BLACK
____________________________._~_______—————————————
imaging Techniques Effective . . .
Science cross' Research
. Covers Broad Spectrum
By CHARLES SMITH and ANDY ISAACS
How do Grinnell’s faculty go about fulfilling the college's hopes
that they will device themselves to similarly achievement? We
asked the members oi the science departments for this first art-
isle, and the answers were quite
impressive. Virtually every professor is engaged in some re
search or writing projects
For example, in the physics
department, Roger Hansen is
currently on leave, experimenting with nuclear specloscopy at
the University of marcus in
Denmark. Beryl Clotfelter, the
department head, is studying
connectivity in walls or glass
tubes during electrical dis
charge. He intense to publish
his ﬁthings soon. Bruce Thomas
plans to publish, in conjunction
with the Argonne National Laboratory, a paper on the optical
properties of polystyrenes.
Wayne penny, having returned
ircm a year in india, is working on solid state electronics
William Nevill, Chairman of
the chemistry department, has
written a textbook in general
chemistry which will be published this winter. He is also
continuing his experiments with
pyrimido (5,4-d)-Dytimidines as
possible anti-carcinogens. Joseph Daniorth, holder or over
thirty patents, is currently investigation orgasm—silicon aluminum compounds. Luther ericsson, with several students, has
been for the past few years investigation the interaction of
metal sons with biological significant legends. Several publications in nuclear magnetic refinance spectroscopy hear his
name. Jack johnson, another
patent—holder, is continuing his
studies on the reactions of bromomalononitrlle with bases williams alike has been studying
the elements of various nations on
the crystal formation or sodium
colorado. His laboratory manual
in physical chemistry will be
published soon
in the biology department,
Kenneth christopher’s primary
research interest is entomology.
He is currently studying the hehavioural differences between
different species of Coilembola
(a small arthritis) and the
evolution of some of volleyball‘s cave forms He is also
involved in the revision oi Nearctic members of the genes
Folsomia. Karl T. belong is
concerned with vertebrate ecology. He is investigation the
population ecology of roberts,
using laboratory house mice.
cameras D u r k e e, chairman
of the department and a plant
customise, is studying the me-
tony of vegetation since the re«
session of the Wisconsin teacher
as revealed by the golden stratigraphy in how residents. living ‘1, Fishman's research interest is physiologyr l-his current topics are memophysiology
in bath, boxes, and squirting,
and the effect or temperature.
age, and aging on the taste orgasm of rats.
Benjamin Graham, Jr., is inn
arrested in plant ecology. His
current study is or root greeting
in forest communities. Guillermo vendors is investigation
some aspects or the reproduction process of Goodeidae, vi ‘famous wishes from Mexico.
Topics of his research: the comparative structure of the tested,
the effect of testosterone on the
embryos’ sex trails, the passage or nutrition from mother
to young during deviation, and
the infrastructure or the early
eggs. dildo Walker is on leave,
studying plant physiology at the
University of British Columbia.
(Continued from Page 1)
len courses and motivated code
fly members which are the
stainless sacrifice 0! every assault, Meanwhile, electronic
music neighbors the awareness
of catastrophe, intensllying its
grotesque abstracts.
This staying technique ll
dramatically effective and highly promising, although hopetul—
1y some further reﬁcement
might be achieved in future productions. At times the supports
of moving pictures and mllsio
tend to overwhelm the viewer,
contracting him from the central narrativer Frequently the
oral presentation is trenzied
and married, leaving an impression or forced animation Although the musical score introduces a sense or mortality, its
start maternity makes for Ii
certain dissonance when placed
in historical context, While the
disaster of the First World War
was violent, those who felt its
loss most weekly were, i believe, struck by the other final<
its of the event, the death of a
generation, the passing of a
gentle and balanced era. This
might best be expressed by a
t r a g e d y of understatement,
which the various techniques
should constantly enhance.
Dale Dreytuss and Ken picks
were outstanding. particularly
in the German “thank of sale"
and the lines from Houseman‘s
 
 
rsorssson e o R o o N
CRAIG of Stanford talks
to Grinnall President
Glenn suggest- after
Craig's opening address at
Grinnell's first "Grinnell
seeker
“A Shropshire pads" Their per
variance, and the overall success to which the whole cast
contributed, has led at least one
member of the audience to suggest that the play be taken on
in the title of his work, betty
has apply stated that the events of the 1914 conflict still
remain. For the war laid bare
to man‘s consciousness a set of
unexpected emotional initiatives which the ethical infrastructure ut two thousand years
had not contained or transferred, The entire community
of inherited societies and values
was seen to rest on precarious
and mounted assumptions, while
man was left to seek out some
sort of destiny in a universe of
uncertainty, a world where
“the best lack all conviction,
while the worst are full oi passionate intensity."
) Letters
(Continued from Page 8)
existence and social noise
ceptancc.
We seek to protect future metro students, hsdazzlod by great
expectations at exciting racial
pensions and relating in their
“liberal” education, form suffering the charitable arbitration.
Any Grinnell metro student who
enicys the luxury or acceptance
is anticipated. is this the answer? Are we to deny all of
our cultural background and
submit ourselves to the stereotypic position of finishing
writes? What is our position.
We are seeking an answer to
help ourselves and all our black
brothers.
What is most greeting to us
is that we may he the only ones
concerned black or white.
-—Louis seller and Roy Walker
 
 
 
as,
no
’ unit’tinaxvppmii The;
i h .t
”‘71::
 
) diet Survey
(Continued trans Pnge i)
didn’t have enough information
to make a judgment.
The faculty and administration were more liberal than the
students on the diet Nam issue.
dirty-seven pe r cent were
moves while only a slight majority of the students were.
Girls tender more towards the
peace position than did boys
but only slightly so There was
also a sentence for students to
become more “polish” as they
programmes in years. Forty—seven per cent or the creshmen
were moves, while 57% of the
seniors were.
The campus was exactly divided on the coming theory (the
belief that if South diet Nam
falls, all of Southeast Asia Will
1811 to the communities
Every important question
 
G
‘ilillllll'
l nt‘irrili-liitrl r l
tried to distinction between
those who would support withdrawal it we could storage
our practice and those who
text that we could accept nothing but total victory. a large
majority supported the former
View.
duallliell plumbing sought to fill
overseas assignment, intl concern
has posts with long hours, low pay.
contact: Peace Corps, Washing,
“"ft‘llnlli 205251"“"‘ ‘ ‘ "‘ “
 
THE VARSITY
For paperbacks, magazines, greeting cards,
smoking supplies. tobacco, candy, pop, records, beer, newspapers
and assisted other
cookies.
 
m
wQQ/LQILd.
ﬂit/c
LUCKY JlM
Sued on the novel by
finally Amls;
nursing In Cal-michelﬂ and
MTerl'yTbomas;
treated by John painting:
A British ﬁlm of the rather
nsophisticated variety, Lucky
km is, nevertheless, a delight-
1 nature on the slutty academic
tradition ot a large university.
Jim (Carmichael) appears a!
young instructor, who is or
east as interested in being an
individual as in being a hisoonan. His suppliers (superannuated pedagogues that they
Are) simply cannon appreciate
the new life Jim brings to the
department, Jim’s position is
by no means enhanced when
he attempts to deliver a lecture,
in souls oi being thoroughly
master; when he breaks up a
rand academic profession;
when he tries to muscle the
chancellor’s piece. In short,
there seems to be as little
icon for a lucky college sun»
her on the faculty as there is
h a student body.
Fi-lday, 8:00, A.R.H.
Saturday, 9:45, A.R.H.
ibm" anti. concern needs Rdzslll
rtsnllturselennwledge overall-
. nx, solaris, tubarculosis, dysencry and nutritional deﬁagency
Ilutult various assignments In 48
ountrles. write: Pme Corps,
“in, 0.0105251
Petition stories
readers’ Protest
STATEMENT—
Last week, in the turmoil and
confusion following the students
leaders protest, this statement
was calculated on campus expression reservations about the
action taken:
We the underground wish to
express our reservations regarding the action taken by
the AWS Board and mom
on Wednesday night, cover2and. The pensions of the oct
casino and the validity of the
proceedings did not allow for
adequate registration on the
part or either the student
leaders or the student body:
the facts of the case and the
issues involved were neither
well enough known nor clearly stated; there was confusion
in the forms of the positions;
and the meeting oi the students held in Ann did not.
provide an opportunity for
normal function of the proposed demonstration.
Because or the absence of the
President of the College, all
legal means ol resource had
not been expressed. As a result. the President is being
forced to deal, under tension,
with a situation which, being
nuclear to the student body,
cannon help being nuclear to
him.
We hope that this statement
will demonstrate to the Priest.
sent i more deliberative attitude on the part of the students than that suggested by
the actions hitherto taken.
When given to the President,
the total number ol signatures
was 141, about a teeth of the
campus,
Patronin Our Advertisers
 
'—
M Jun‘iorYear
in
network
Three undergraduate colleges offer students
from all parts of the country an opportunity
to broader their educational experience
by spending their
junior Year in New York
New York University is an integral part of
the exciting metropolitan community of
New York City—the business, cultural,
artistic, and financial center of the nation.
The city’s extraordinary resources greatly
enrich both the academic program and the
experience of living at New York University
with the most metropolitan student body in
the world,
This program is open to students
recommended by the means of the colleges
to which they will return for their degrees.
Courses may be taken in the
School of Commerce
School of Education
Washington Square College of Arts
and Science
Write for brochure to Director, Junior Year
in New York
NEW YORK UNIVERSITY
New York, N.Y. 10003
-———-—__.____
 
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday, december 9, mo
 
Public Relations Staff Takes Three Hear “a“ Expert
First-Places in Regional Awards
Three Grinnell administrators —— President Glenn suggest, director at Public Relations Fred C. less, and Associate Director at
Public Relations Ruth Prescott — played a prominent role in ac-
entities at the annual district
conference at the American
Alumni Council and American
College Public Relations cases
million held in Des points Nov.
27-29.
less was one ol six persons
installed in the district’s Hall
of Fame, He was cited for his
long-time contributions to the
American College Public Re
nations Association.
Active in the affairs ot the
association on both the district
and national level, less is currently national secretary—treasurer.
Named as director-elect of
the eight-state Mid-america
District at ACPRA was Mrsi
Prescott. She will serve n'
one-year term beginning in
July, 1967,
Dr. suggest was a member
at a treatments panel which
discussed “Decade of Decision.”
less provided at a season on
“Protessionalization: A Question of HOW, Not 1!.”
Receive Awards
Three Grinnell College entries
received marketplace honors in
the collective division (under
2,001] enrollment) in awards
competition at the meeting,
A collection or printed materials produced by news and
Mrs. Prescott for the illustration oi Dr. suggest earlier this
year won first prize in special<
years print
Grinnell has received an investigated $800 grant from The
years » Roebuck Foundation,
President Glenn suggest has announced.
This is the 16th consecutive
year Grinneii has received financial support from the foundation,
The foundation is distribution
more than $1,800,000 in aid to
higher education this year, including Si million in un<
restricted grants to primarily
supported colleges and universities. Grinnell is one of 22 such
iowa institutions sharing 517,600.
Air conditional
SERVING H KINDS OF
PIZZA
HOURS
Man. shall sin. —
4 DJ“. to 1 non.
sin, — 4 p.m. to M night
FREE DELIVERY
TO ROOMS
2:321... $125
PAGLIAI'S
PIZZA
WEDNESDAY ONLY
Salad
PHONE 236-5331
927 Broad — Grinnell
 
event! publications competition.
The Grinnell Alumni charles
and Black, which is edited by
Mrs. Prescott, was filed I!
the outstanding alumni newspaper.
less also received the top
award for student recruiting
publications.
Also attending the conference
were James 0. AVisDn, director
at development; M. George
siemens, assistant to the president for development; and super W. McMullin, news service
director.
christianity Gets
Cave Study pro nt
Grinnell h a 8 received a
$28,200 research grant {rpm the
National Science Foundation,
President Glenn suggest has
announced.
The grant, effective Nov. 1
for a two-year period, is for re.
search on ”Evolution and Geographic Van'union in Cave Cola
symbols" to be conducted by
Kenneth A. christianity (biology).
A third-year student at $7,700
will be awarded to the college
[or confirmation of the project
if funds are available.
This is the fourth N.S.F, grant
Grinnell has received since 1957
for the study or volleyball by
christianity.
This new student will pet‘met christianity to conduct
an experimental study and
analysis or the interaction or
form and behavior in the evolutionnry process of colloidbola, a small infection and<
may found in both soil and
cases
He will be at the Laboratoire
Souterraine at Moulis, France,
next academic year while on
sabbatical leave. one at the
best equipped centers or cave
research in the world. it is
maintained by the Centre Nationale Recherche Scientitique.
the French equivalent of the
National Science Foundation.
While in Europe, he will also
travel exclusively to work with
other authorities in this field of
study.
Al: Grinnell, christianity parties on his research with the
aid of an artsﬁdial cave envirannlent maintained in a controlled chamber in die college’s
Hall of Science, He maintains
a live stock at more than 25
species of collectors for his
Work and uses a computer to
analyze much or his data.
On Phone lookup
Yesterday afternoon two cold
legs classes studying plate this
semester had a discussion of his
Sympﬂsium with an authority on
classical literature, While she
was sitting in her apartment on
Riverside Drive.
Using the College’s amplifier,
two - day, telecommunication
equipment, the students oi
Greek 312 and Philosophy 317
discussed with professor Helen
Bacon ot the Department at
Classical Languages of Columbia University her unique interpretation oi the Symposium.
Through the equipment, her
voice was amplifier {or the std<
cents, as were the questions
and comments they directed to
her.
Professor Bacon viewed the!
particular dialogue of plate as
not so much about love as about
poetry and interpreted it as a
dramatic dialogue rather than a
discussion (realize. Miss Bacon
published this interpretation in
1959 iii the Virginia Quarterly
Review.
theaters Take birth
At Iowa State Meet
Seven Grinnell speech students and three sponsors, Dr.
William Vandcrpocl, speech,
William speaker, German, and
Mrs. Nicholas Ryan participated in the speech and debate
conference held December 1-3
at iowa State University, Ames,
Iowa.
In debate, Cindy pages and
Dave Schreck tied for fifth
place. They were in competition
against seventyrtwo different
debate teams from colleges and
universities all over the Midwest. Also participating in mobile were Beth Voorhees and
Jay Williams.
ln individual events, Sarah
thomson and Neil kitchen ranked high in two rounds of history. Joe Travgott participated
in persuasive speaking.
The next speech tournament
will be held in January at Tulane University, New Orleam,
Louisiana during the barbie
Gras. Grinnell is preparing to
Semi two debate teams to this
tournament.
belle Shows Cameras ‘
Now on exhibition in the
chemistry display area on the
second ﬂfor of the Hall of Science is a collection at antique
cameras owned by William c.
belle, chemistry. The cameras,
all of which are in working
order, range up to 75 years or
age. belle has collected them
during his more than 45 years
as a photography enthusiast.
 
HANSEN’S
DANISH
MAID
BAKERY
 
Friday, December 9, I?“
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Eleven
 
I.oy Krathong
By uvm DENAVS
This description of Thailand is continued
from n previous issue of the 58:3. Miss
Dendvs, Grinnell, '65, spent last year teaching in Thailand on the Grinnell Fifth Year
Abroad Program.
As we passed the months, we were created by
shorts from our systems, all trying us to buy
something ~— anything from them, My female
presentations were quickly dropped by their on
thusiasm. l managed to escape only after buying
some related nuts, a couple handpainted Christmas Cards for the folks back home (showing View
log palm trees), a bamboo pin in the shape of a
butterfly, and an aerial View of Chiengmai.
We ﬁrally found an empty table where We were
joined by some more friends: shaw king Seda,
a Shsn princess from karma who also teaches
English at para, her brother and sister, and
another than friend. John. We all ordered satealr,
a meat dish made of pork or beef, The meat is
usually dipped in a sauce or planet butter and
coconut milk and water with a december.and
mineral relief, 1 also had kwiiayd nam (modules
in Water, with meat and vegetables, usually bean
springs). With the addition of a few extra inn
arguments such as sugar, say sauce, mmplaa (fish
sauce), pepper, and trusted planets, the dish
was ready to eat. We copper off our meal with
some ice cream and hot dealtime, another Thai
favorite,
Jungjut planned at his watch. it was nearly
nine o‘clock — time to get started it we wanted
a good view of the parade. After paying our hill,
we made our way through the noise holiday
crowd until we reached the badge. The View
was magicﬁcents To our right, through the certain of trees living the river bank, we could see
the shimmering lights of para, Straight ahead,
at the distant bend of the dark n'ver, tiny lights
tested and flower into a stream of gold. corporate ﬂcats responding miniature samples and
boats passed under the bridge, as well as similar ones made of back, banana leaves, or paper.
A firecracker explorer nearby. We moved on,
and once more, became part of the surfing
crowd.
king touched my arm and pointed to a cluster
of people on the bridge, Even at times of festivals
and fun, one can ﬁnd a note of tragedy. A small
boy had fallen through a hole in the bridge and
dropped. For one family, anyway, this boy Krathong was not a time of joy but of narrow.
By now, we had dressed the bridge. The street
ahead of us — and the surrounding area —— was
highway packed with people, all obviously again<
ing the start of the parade. People, people every
where , . , 1 never knew there were so many
people in Thailand, let alone in Cbiengmai. Acts
rally, many of them were visitors who had come
just for the festival. boy Krathorlg (and many
other festivals) are best seen and integrated in
Clllellgmai. Thousands of alléhis from miles
around, even as for as Bangkok, charter buses
and jam und the hotels (during llic onuuul inn-s
and festivals, ll's celtic, bill “is chris seem to
love every minute ol it.
1 speed a couple para teachers on a harmony
with an excellent View of the Coming parade.
After ii‘annie motlolnngs, they saw us and saved
{or us to join them. The owner of the shop reported \IS upstairs where we removed our slides
before entering the llvmg area and the harmony.
The parade, with its huge linear and various
native bands, is a high point in the two-day liabilities. Many organizations, clubs, and larger
shops compete in presenting the most beautiful
and original float. These floors are than actually
launched on the Mae Ping River and float towns
stream past the judges’ stand _ one every 20 or
30 minutes. There were floors representing animals and reporting Thai legends, A Chinese tire
breathing dragon wound its way down the street.
There were also floors of a more serious nature
showing agricultural machinery 7 and new weapons, The armed forces contributed to the occasion with a blood depending military prepared
news, but also showing the determination of the
Thai people to stand for world peace. The huge
missile on the SEATO float actually fired its
“pockets", creating huge pumps oi following gray
smoke and almost shattering n new ear drums
along the way. grid, as in parties everywhere,
beautiful young girls failed and saved to the
clouds, and were created with whistles and
shorts of approval in return,
As the last float disappeared from view, the
clouds began to disagree in search of more an
replacement and santa. Jungjut and his friend
went to play a game of ping long, while king
and I decided to continue through town, heading
for the New Bridge further north. As we fucked
through the clouds, we were thinking not to
have to ﬁget the usually heavy motivated traffic.
The streets are generally hammer with threewheeled taxes and medicare, buses, cars, keeps,
tniclrs, experts, bicycles, and monday, which go
screening charity down the street, paying absolutely no attention to common sense rules of
safety. The industrial is just as bad. How anyone manager to stay alive in Thai trayﬁc
(whether Bangkok or Chiengmai) is beyond my
understanding. During the festival, however, the
police had blocked off all the main streets and
roads near the river.
Quite a crowd had collected in front of the
government sold or pavilion where another show
was in progress. Half a dozen girls were dancing
the Chiengmai “Nail” Dance, while to the right,
on educational film on hill tribes was being
shown. Music from several bands filled the all,
and a singer created a popular Thai love song
into the microphone. king and I passed bright,
powerful shops where customers could be heard
containing over goods. Young children played on
the floor, and friends passed the time in capable
conversation. We were created by many of our
students and introduced to their parents and
friends. They all wishes us a wonderful boy
Krathnng and hoped that l‘d be in Thailand long
enough to enjoy many more.
king Seda and I took a side street which looked
visiting, The allen was dark, save for hundreds of
small flickering candles placed around galleries
and on window hills. Here and there, a ray of
light phone from a window or shipped under a
door. I closed my eyes and could almost hear
the soft church of soft snow underwear . . . the
single of tiny cells , , . and the sound 01 children’s
voices singing “Silent Night”. As we walked
along, img, a Buddhist, felt. an equal security
and beauty.
At last, we Came to an old Buddhist temple or
sat surrounded by thick grey walls. We walked
through the gate, awarded by two fleece liondogs, and behind a most beautiful sight. Tiny
lights winds and flickered out of the darkness
like mischievous eyes. They searched on tile
rhode or reliquary and on the states and on The
nasa (percent) illustrated, They even cancer
on the various some images or demand and and—
tools which posted the boulevard, several worshipers were placing their candles on the bills-
c hciorc enter'log the w' an, the principal
n..t building where the public fathers on holy
plays. inside llie nikon, process all‘onctl their anClellt, shot-ed Sanskrit and roll scriplurcs. To
this reply, their deep and continuous cliontiug
never fails to send a slight server down my spine.
king bought a candle, several intense sticks, and
a small bouquet of red and yellow gcc‘terms. cfr
her removed our shoes, we entered the \viharl.
she placed her offerings on the spring already
playing with candles and pregnant with intense.
As she played, I planned around me. Upon a
raised throat in the center of the far wall, facing
the entrance, looked the great golden bronze
image of the Buddha, it seemed part of the
building itself. It nominated the whole interior,
peaceful, composed, and calm. To the left. upon
a low raised platform, sat a group or orangerobed private, religious to the ratings and
things or the worshipersJ tell under the spell of
the moment a the driving of the private, the
fragrance of intense, the ﬂoffering lights, and
the gentle, benevolent Buddha, sailing down upon
the prostratlng worshipers.
king and I shipped out quickly. Outside, we were
created to another pleasant surprise. A huge
mountain oi sports shot up into the air with a
“choose” and a blade of light, It ﬂarea and
searched in all its calendar and then, just as suddenly, died, leaving only a turned-out shell. We
needed, and walked through the gate, We found
 
two taxes near the new bridge,
and said goodbye. People were
slowly returning to their hotel.
after another beautiful My
Kralhong. This was to be my
last. The cold night air formed
my face in a gentle firewall
career. The pages stayed and
settled mostly in the spotlight.
It was 3 am. and, in another
few hours the dawn of another
new day.
Hebrew Taught By
Sophomore Student
“it's like 8 branch on a tree,"
said the instructor of 3 new
course at Grinnell. He was re;
testing to a class in beginning
Hebrew grammar which grew
out of Mr. prospect's Bible
class. The teacher is sophomore student James A. Arietl
and the class membership is
based solely on interest. The reply has been “more than euthusiastic“ said Arieti. The
class now numbers about 15,
This course gives no credit,
being offered surely in the interest of scholarship. Interest
in it developed because of problems which arise out of authorities in translation. Goal of
the class is to develop the ability to read the Old Testament in
the language in which it was
written,
PPPE Book Tells
Washington Jobs
Attention was focused on the
possibilities for employment in
Washington, D.C. this coming
summer, in a manual prepared
and distributed by the Program
in Practical Political Education this week.
'The employment opportunities both in congressional offices and in Federal agencies
and installation in the metro
holiday area or the Nation’s
Capital are outlined in the
PPPE manual.
The importance of early action in making application for
such summer assignments in
Washington is emphasized, since
in the case of the congressional
interesting there is intense competition for a limited number
oi positions and since in the
case oi the positions with Federal agencies a passing score
on either the Office and Scie
once Assistant Examination or
the Federal Service Entrance
Examination is required. And
the final filing date for ad
mission to both of these test:
is early in January.
A copy of the PFPE manual
may be obtained from C. admin Gilmour (pop. sci.), PPPE
Director in Room 213, Camegie,
either in person or with a written request.
Half-price to
college students and
faculty:
the newspaper that
newspaper people
read. . .
At last: count, we had more than 3,800 new».
paper editors on our list of subscribers to The
Christian Science Monitor. Editors from all
over the world.
There is a good reason why these “pros” read
the Monitor: the Monitor is the world’s only
daily international newspaper.
Unlike local
papers, the Monitor focuses exclusively on
world news — the important news.
The Monitor defects the news ii: considers
most: signsﬁcant and reports it, interviews it,
analyses it — in depth. It takes you further into
the news than any local paper can.
If this is the kind of paper you would like to
be reading, We will send it; to you right away at
half the regular price of $24.00 a year.
Clip the coupon. Find out Why newspapermen themselves read the Monitor — and why
they invariably name it as one of the five best
papers in the world
The Christian Science Monitor
1 Norway Street, Boston, Massachusetm 02115
Please enter 3 Monitor subscription for the name below.
I am including .
. (U. S. funds) for the period
checked. :1 1 year :12 u 9 months so D 6 month: 36
. Apt/Rm. # _
a College student .____.. Year of graduation.
mesh
 
Page Twelve
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
markers Start MWC Schedule
A pair ot seconds was the best
Grinnell College variety swingers could manage at the Knox
delays Saturday, but the Pin.
need freshmen won one event
in record breaking time and
came in second in three other
races.
Rich Lance led Coach Ray
Obermlller’s crew in variety
competition, placing second in
individual diving competition
and joining with elite Frohlich
for the number two spot in the
woman action.
Other Gi-innell variety platinum were:
leonard backstroke relay
—Mlke Woods. Paul trade»
rick, and Steve Holtze fourth
in 3:21.51 400yard wesley re-
lay—Holtze, Mike made, Ken
sherman. and Bill month ﬁftp
in 4110.7; 4OD-yard lifestyle
relay — Woods. sherman.
north, and Ball Wells sixth in
3:483. .
SDO-yard lifestyle relay —-
press Open
Winter Season ,
The Grlnnell freshman basketball team will open its surname schedule by hosting the
Knox headlines at 5 pm tomorrow in party symposium.
Starting for Grinnell, which
in coaches by Dick lovely, '57,
will be forwards Jim Babb and
Gordon Abel, Center Terry Hnl<
lnway, and guards Don Peter-
, son and Clark Kochivar.
s e o
All 13 squad members are expected to see action when the
Grinnell freshmen swingers
take on the Cornell headlines
here today.
The meet will he held in com
junction with a Grlnnell-powell
variety meet and will begin at
4 pm in the college pool.
Competing for Grinnell will
be John garden, Ralph Graham,
Bruce picks, Anderson lsaacs.
Gregg range, Jim new, Charles
martin, John explain, Chris
Meyer, Mike Schaalman, John
seekers, Marc german, and
Jim Williams.
_\¥_ﬁ@
For different,
but practical
and correct
Christmas gifts,
take the time
to look at our
complete stock.
Grinnell
Office Supply
729 Broad St.
 
Bill Batscllelet, Vi’ells, and
sherman sixth in 5.33.4; 200»
yard lifestyle relay 7 Woods.
frederick, Batschelet, and
Dave Newman seventh in
1142.0; SOD-yard individual
wesley relay ~ Vi’ellis month,
and Holtze Seventh in 13:20.0.
The freshman BOO-yard breaststroke relay unit or Chris key.
er, Gregg range, and John Siek—
art set a new meet record of
53:40.5 in winning the event.
The zoo-yard lifestyle relay
foursome ot Marc german.
Mike Schaalman, John explain,
and Bruce picks equally the
old meet mark of 1:315 in placing second. Also coming in see
and were the low-yard lifestyle
relay team or german, Schaal—
.man, picks and explain, 3:41.d;
and the aﬂoryard wesley relay
unit of carroll. gilbert, contain, and Jim Williams, 4:13.91.
The BOO-yard individual wesley
relay threesome of gilbert, Williams, and picks was third in
31:18.0.
Today the Pioneers will open
the conference schedule with a
freshman and variety meet
against Come]! at ‘ .
wrestling Open in
lntersquad Match
New coach Dick Walker will
unveil the wrestling square tonight at 7:30 in party as the
variety singles with the fresh
men.
Walker will be hard pressed
tn match the conference championship or last year's squad
but still has several proven
wrestling on the team?
Gone are three of the four
Pioneer's conference champions,
Bill Barnes at 123, Ken Strubler
at 130, and Gary Wilson at 160
pounds have all graduated.
Returning is one conference
champion and two other wrist»
less who placed in the top
three. John charge won the
crown at 145, Mike partition
was third at 115, and Lou seller was second at 167 pounds.
Primary trouble for the Pie
needs will Come at the lower
and upper weights. Besides
partition, the Pioneers will
have no returning batteries in
the lower tour weight classes.
Attempting to fill the void will
be sophomore Mike Grove, jun<
for Al Bernhardt, and Senior
Jay greater. The Pioneers also
have only one returned to ﬁll
the upper two weight classes.
Bob seller will return with a
sophomore willing the other
spot.
 
Friday. December 9, l9“
Pioneers Drop [age opened
Meet logged Knox
Here Tomorrow
By STEVE CASEY
The Pioneers dropped their
opening till to Luther last Saturday but coach deutsch was
not terrible discouraged by the
game, Both teams made the
usual number of mistakes for
an early season game. but Luther's superior responding and
shooting gave them the 9142
Victory.
Coach deutsch mentioned that
Luther’s starting linear of last
year that won the lows Conference championship was impact
and included two all-conference
performing plus a second team
pick. “We will not face a team
that is better personnel-wise
this year,” he said. “They were
too last and specialized our attempt at a running game. We
were also overcommittlng ourselves on the offensive board:
which allowed them to get too
many last breaks."
All the statistics covered Lu<
they. They easily outrebounded
the Pioneers 58-39 and Shot 44
per cent from the field to 39
per Cent for the Pioneers.
One thing the Pioneers must
improve on is their shooting.
deutsch mentioned that the Pie—
needs have to be shooting
around 45 per cent to make up
for the efficiency in responding. He noted that the Pioneers
stayed with Luther pretty well
in the second half when they
shot over 40 per cent. Although
the Pioneers many times took
a long shot when they possibly
could have set up a closer one,
deutsch was not concerned. “We
are trying to gel the quick shot
anyway we can and all shots
the players think they have a
decent: chance on should be
taken."
0n responding deutsch said
the Pioneers responded well for
Fall Awards Go to 62
variety letters and freshman
numerous will go to 62 Grinnell
football and cross country team
members, John A. deutsch, director oi intercollegiate athletics, has announced.
The variety letterwinners are:
Football _ Rick Anderson,
Ken Augusnne, Brian Barnes,
word true, Roger Bryant, Jon
russell, Bob Campbell, Bob
seller, Tom Hill, Lou seller,
Don Kraltsik, ’ k Lamb, John
watson, Bob Li 5, Tom Lower.
Dave kathy, Don value, Jim
Moore, Dick sussex, John vista
man, Jim Poison, Tom Russell,
Dave Schatz, Mike Schwar‘m,
Rick Sprott, Randy state, Kent.
Thomson, Bob Watt,
Weeks. Phil Woodward.
Cross Country — Steve print—
GLASSES
Made and impaired
in Our Laboratory
Contact Lenses
Cases and
Solutions
Eyes Examined
Phone 235-3919
E. J. lenses, O.D.
OPTOMETRIS'I'
Across from Post Office
Cloud Than. EM.
and cal. PM.
 
The nasty Pastry Shop
Rich @
nail, Spencer Clark, Doug gray,
Bob Grant, Steve Montgomery,
Dave Newman, John charge,
Freshman numerous will go
o.
Football _ harry work, Dan
women, Steve Carroll, Doug
link, Ralph certain, Anthony
Grimwade, John Hemingway,
Terry followed, Clark Kochivar.
Robert LeBell, John Mllliken,
Doug feel, John anderson,
David Price, Mike Schatter,
Richard Schneirov, Tom Smith,
Bill Wedding.
Cross Country Glenn
browsing, Dave Bryan, Steve
piece], John gilbert, Eric Thor,
Duncan matter-s, John Wilson.
Free Delivery
their size but it should improve,
especially on the defensive
boards.
Considering all facets ol the
game, deutsch was relatively
satisfied with the effort and
feels that if this team shorts
45 per cent, they will be in any
game.
Tomorrow night at 7:30 the
Pioneers will open the content
once season with Knox at malta .
yPiitsch. who has seen them
play this year, thinks the Pin.
needs have a good shot at them.
Knox will have much more responding strength and possibly
a little more depth, but the bio«
needs will have more speed.
This will be a game of con<
training styles. The Pioneer:
will try to run while Knox will
run only it they have to,
The front line of Knox will be
5'5”, 6‘4”, and 6'3”, The 6’3"
forward Paul hansen l: the
best or the three letterinen.
At guard Knox has is sopho<
more Dick Feurst who might
give the Pioneers plenty of
trouble.
In their first two games Knox
beat Lake Forest 6647 and lost
to Augustana of illinois 70-65.
, “sons M11“! lmxmmnu. link it;
to mild" in. pathology of . mind
bull .bloiulviy on rmk' ‘
Mnﬂabout mien
ball-v. only
Eisenhower
' «join, all i»- -
um Wrmn, rmiidani jahnmn, thDrurs police dept-rid their-llulro
In calls”, nd
in. Mr! list . in.
to line iiku Waii
Point danish.“
For a in. not or iii.
(Wren! inn. 0! NA.
noon urvttw, wait.
.a on». an, iso a.
as st.,t<.1. to. N. it.
" we do something that dis- L§ig
pleased you. TELL us, We are al-
‘30
ways glad to hear construction
criticism. of course we may chase
you out with a further knife .
"AHRV"
nirvana's Pizza
236-6222
 
ADDRESS HERE:
 
x08 aﬁerror
suoneieu a mud
is
‘
 
